1 DOCK STREET DAM DRAFT REPORT ON ALTERNATIVES CONSIDERED FOR THE DAM PREPARED BY HARRISBURG-SUSQUEHANNA RIVER WORKING GROUP May 21, 2001 In Partial Fulfillment of: DEP and PFBC v. City of Harrisburg, 53 
2
The Parties and all members of the Working Group have freely participated in the discussions and offered information, suggestions, and contributions to the report.
However, it is important to note that some of the Parties and members of the working group are also employees of regulatory agencies that may have the responsibility to review applications for permits for projects involving the repair or replacement of the Dock Street Dam.
No statements, whether written, verbal, legal or factual made by agency representatives during the deliberations of the working group or in this report, should be construed as an intent to act favorably or unfavorably on a future permit application, or are otherwise binding upon the agencies.
The agencies are bound to act in a fair, impartial, and deliberate manner upon receipt of an application and in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.
3
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY The Harrisburg-Susquehanna Working Group was formed to identify and analyze potential alternatives to the proposed Harrisburg Hydroelectric Project in an attempt to provide a means acceptable to the Parties for the settlement of the protracted litigation over that project.
The members of the working group were selected by the Parties for their expertise, responsibility, and advocacy.
The group identified seven alternatives for analysis: · no action · repair the dam at elevation 292 mean sea level (msl).
(The existing Dock Street dam has a crest elevation of 292 feet msl) · replace the dam with inflatable dam at 292 feet msl; · replace the dam at 294 feet msl with inflatable dam; · replace the dam at 296 feet msl with inflatable dam; · replace the dam at 298 feet msl with inflatable dam; · remove the dam. .
Extensive information was gathered from existing sources and new information was developed and analyzed, drawing on the expertise of the members of the working group and outside consultants.
During the fifteen months that the group met, the alternatives were examined and discussed and the positive and negative consequences of each considered.
We recommend that the existing Dock Street Dam be replaced with an inflatable type dam with a crest elevation no greater than 296 feet msl.
Any replacement dam must include provisions for improved fish passage.
The establishment of the final crest elevation of the dam requires further detailed engineering and environmental analyses.
A key factor in determining the optimum elevation will be the establishment of the mode of operation of the dam that best balances the benefits to recreation, environmental resources, fish passage, water quality, and dam safety.
If the City concurs that the group's recommendation includes viable alternatives to the hydroelectric project, then the City will withdraw its license application before the FERC for the hydroelectric project and the DEP and the PFBC will withdraw their appeal at the Commonwealth Court.
However, in implementing any such alternative, the working group specifically acknowledged the regional benefits and impacts of the Dock Street Dam and recommends that the City join with a regional agency or authority to be identified or established to take the next steps to develop the project.
4
TABLE OF CONTENTS I. Introduction A. History and Background B. City of Harrisburg's Objectives C. Working Group Interests 
Fish Passage 2.
Fishes 
No Action B. Remove Dam C. Repair with Concrete at Same Height D. Replace w/ Inflatable Dam same height (292') E. Replace with a Higher Inflatable Dam 1.
294' 2.
296' 3.
298' F. Operational Considerations G. Funding Findings Recommendations Appendices A. Stipulation B. Working Group Members C. Maps D. Cost Estimates ............................
...........................
...........................
...........................
5 6 6 6
II.
............................
9 ...........................
9 ...........................
...........................
...........................
............................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
............................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
12 14 15 16 16 20 21 25 30 34 39 41 43 44 45 45 47 49 51 53
III.
IV.
V. VI. VII.
...........................
53 ...........................
57 ...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
...........................
58 58 60 61 63
5
INTRODUCTION This report was prepared by the Harrisburg- Susquehanna River Working Group created pursuant to a Commonwealth Court Stipulation by and between the City of Harrisburg, Department of Environmental Protection and the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission.
This report identifies and analyzes issues associated with alternatives to the City of Harrisburg's proposed hydroelectric project that could address the City's goals and objectives.
I A. History and Background The City of Harrisburg, in May 1987, filed an application with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) for construction and operation of a proposed hydroelectric project, to be located on the Susquehanna River in Harrisburg.
As necessary prerequisite for the City to obtain a license from the FERC, the City applied to the Department of Environmental Protection for certification under Section 401 of the Clean Water Act.
The Department denied the 401 certification in a letter dated March 2, 1988.
Subsequently, the City submitted an appeal of the denial to the Environmental Hearing Board ("EHB") and the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission intervened in support of the DEP denial.
On June 28, 1996, the EHB issued its final adjudication in the matter, sustaining the City's appeal of the denial of the 401 certification.
Following a subsequent EHB denial of a DEP motion for reconsideration, the DEP, on January 8, 1997, filed an appeal of the EHB decision with the Commonwealth Court of Pennsylvania.
Subsequently the City, the DEP and the PFBC (The Parties) requested a stay of the proceeding and several extensions were approved by the court for the purpose of conducting settlement discussions.
The settlement discussions resulted in the Parties agreeing to a process to attempt to resolve all of the disputes relative to the City's proposed hydroelectric project.
The details of the agreement are specified in a legal Stipulation (Appendix A).
The process included formation of an advisory group consisting of representatives of the Parties and the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.
Also invited to participate were the Pennsylvania Game Commission, the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, The Susquehanna River Basin Commission, the Boating Advisory Board, two members of the public, the Chesapeake Bay Foundation and others.
This group was known as the City of Harrisburg's Susquehanna River Working Group or " Working Group."
The purpose of the Working Group was to identify alternatives to the proposed hydroelectric project that could best address the City's goals and objectives.
The working group was charged with meeting at least monthly for not more than one year to identify alternatives, identify and discuss the positive and negative aspects associated with each alternative, identify sources of funding and responsibility for the development, construction and operation for each alternative.
The results of these proceedings are presented in this report and will be the subject of a public hearing.
The Stipulation indicated that a public hearing would be held within 45 days of issuing the final report.
The Parties agreed to conclude negotiations for a final settlement agreement within 90 days of the public hearing and to pursue any alternatives in a manner to be agreed upon by the Parties taking into account any public comments.
So long as alternatives are viable and in the best interest of the City, the City agreed to withdraw the request for the Section 401 Water
6
Quality Certification along with the license application pending before the FERC.
If the City withdrawals its request for certification and the FERC application, the DEP and PFBC will withdraw their appeal of the EHB adjudication to the Commonwealth Court of Pennsylvania.
I C. City of Harrisburg's Objectives 1.
Safety Eliminate fatalities and make a safer environment than currently exists.
2.
Recreation Preserve or expand boating acreage without adversely impacting the current boating community.
3.
Aesthetics a.
Increase attractiveness of the waterfront.
b. Increase use of waterfront, while preserving/enhancing environmental values.
4.
Fish Passage Improve from current condition.
5.
Natural Resources Protect the river and surrounding areas.
6.
Infrastructure Preserve and maintain present waterfront development and amenities
I D. Working Group Interests and Functions Proposals to build a new impoundment structure in the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg have been debated and contested for many years.
As the result of a Commonwealth Court Stipulation (Appendix A), a group of individuals was convened in the summer of 1999 in an attempt to develop a fresh approach to the various issues concerning the range of project proposals and their potential impacts.
The members represented a diverse group that includes governmental agencies, non-governmental agencies and private citizens (Appendix B. Working Group Members) so as to represent as wide a perspective as possible.
Early in the process the group chose to call themselves the Harrisburg/Susquehanna River Working Group (hereinafter referred to as the Group).
This title reflected an interest in addressing a wide range of feasible alternatives meet the stated objectives.
Ground rules, established by the group, included: $ $ $ $ $ A commitment to attend all meetings or have a designated alternate attend in their place Establishing the goal of the group to prepare a final report which listed the group=s recommendations and a roadmap for implementation A commitment to develop consensus recommendations and, outline in the final report, the areas of disagreement.
A recognition that the facilitators would remain neutral and ensure that all group members have equal access to participate and provide input.
All media contacts were to provide general information about the group's goals and accomplishments without attributing comments or positions to any individual or stakeholder entity.
7
Meetings were held on a monthly basis at various locations hosted by a volunteer group member based in and around Harrisburg.
The format for each meeting followed this general sequence: 1.
Meetings were convened by the facilitators and old business was discussed.
In this manner, prior commitments by group members were fulfilled.
This would entail the distribution of any information, reports, position papers or other information that had been identified and requested at earlier meetings.
The material was discussed to the extent judged appropriate by the group.
Presentations, made by group members or invited representatives, more fully explained or discussed a particular issue.
The issue on the table was fully discussed by all members.
Where possible, conclusions or agreements were reached by consensus.
Some issues were tabled for further discussion.
The group, aided by the facilitators, would take stock of their progress (at the particular meeting and for the overall task).
Items required for subsequent meetings were identified and responsible parties identified.
The next meeting site location, date and anticipated agenda were the final points of discussion.
2.
3.
4.
5.
The group procedure which evolved can be described as a step-wise process: $ $ $ An issue would be raised and then the state of knowledge concerning the issue was presented and discussed.
Gaps in the information were identified and commitments were made to fill these gaps.
Subsequent issues were dealt with generally in a logical progression.
There were instances when debate "leapfrogged" to an issue out of the standard sequence.
This usually occurred when a new, more pressing issue was raised or when an impasse was reached due to widely divergent opinion or a lack of data.
Those instances notwithstanding, the body of knowledge (and most importantly mutual understanding) accumulated within the group as they gained a more complete understanding of all of the identified relevant issues.
The facilitators and the group members worked diligently to openly discuss all the issues.
Each group representative began the process with a unique set of information about the resources and history of this reach of the river.
At the outset no individual had complete knowledge of all the relevant information, but by the end of the process each group member had learned considerably from the other participants.
Although all members did not agree on the relative importance of each factor, each member had a more complete appreciation of all the issues and perspectives.
Important sets of information concerned: $ $ The history of the existing Dock Street Dam, its initial purpose and the evolution of uses of the impoundment structure and the upstream pool.
An appreciation of the recent controversy about the proposed hydroelectric facility and the current state of affairs.
The current condition of the structure of the dam, the problems that the location and structure have caused over time (e.g. safety and anadromous fish passage).
An understanding of the continued deterioration of the structure and the potential ramifications if no action is taken.
The type and extent of the social values (economics, aesthetics, etc.) that the dam and
$
8
pool have provided over time.
These included: The development of Riverfront Park, City Island and other uses of the waterfront Power boating use of the impoundment including the current operation (and constraints on operation) of the Pride of the Susquehanna.
Non-motorized use including bathers, bird waters, canoe users, students, etc. $ The type and extent of the natural resources in and around the dam and pool environs.
These included: The fisheries resources, both resident and anadromous.
Wildlife resources including waterfowl, wading birds and shorebirds, their use of the pool, island archipelago and shoreline for breeding, feeding, resting and movement.
Sensitivity to the type and range of human activity was also discussed.
The type and range of wetland, riparian and island vegetation communities.
$ $ $ $ $ Details about an inflatable rubber dam including the materials of which it is composed, the type of construction and the range of operational alternatives that are feasible.
An appreciation of the range of conditions of the River and in the existing pool with regard to the extent of impounded area under average, low flow and flood conditions.
An understanding of the range of environmental conditions which would result in various impoundment configurations and operational plans.
The potential ramifications of the dam removal alternative.
An appreciation of some issues from a larger geographical perspective.
In particular the increasing statewide recreational demand, the status of avian communities and efforts to restore anadromous fish runs were discussed.
At the final stage, the issues raised were defined and clarified.
Each issue was ranked by each group member and the collective rankings were arrayed and discussed.
A consensus was reached with regard to the relative ranking of the issues.
Upon reflection of the ranking of issues the group separated the issues into major and minor categories.
Project alternatives received a similar treatment.
A range of alternatives was described and the relevant factors clarified.
Each group member voted for each alternative individually and the collective tally was arrayed and discussed.
A smaller range of alternatives was carried forward as the range of consensus alternatives.
Although all participants did not agree with the final outcome it was judged to be fair and a reflection of the divergent viewpoints and priorities of the group membership.
This list does not represent a consensus, but is rather the raw listing of interests represented in the group in no particular order.
· · · · · · Enhance recreational opportunities Protect heron rookeries Develop solutions and avoid an impasse Maximize ability for fish to travel Protect wildlife Protect PA endangered birds
9
Keep [dam] facilities in good repair Maintain the river as a highlight and focal point of the city, and as a tremendous resource Minimize cumulative impacts of dam projects along the length of the river Find/test an alternative that has applicability in other areas of the river Minimize impoundment of water; maximize free-flowing areas Increase water depth to allow more recreation, make the area more attractive, and bring in more business interests · Maximize the results of this working group process (Group members are encouraged that we are using this avenue to develop alternatives and solutions.)
· Maximize opportunities for people to enjoy the river · Maximize economic development, while protecting the river and its habitats · Maintain areas of shallow water needed by wading birds · Minimize disturbance of wildlife by people and motor boats · Maximize angler/fishing opportunities · Maximize/maintain opportunities for canoeing and kayaking · Maximize water quality related to fish and other living creatures · Maintain the beauty of the river · Ensure any accepted alternative complies with laws and regulations · Ensure the City of Harrisburg can manage and control additional boaters should an alternative increase this number · Maximize dam safety · Ensure sufficient water level to navigate the Riverboat, around the Island and up to the Governor's mansion · Increase unity between east and west shore communities Initially, the Working Group broke into smaller groups to brainstorm how the alternatives would affect attributes of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg within the potential project area.
The results of the subgroup efforts were distributed to the entire Working Group and then discussed.
Consensus was achieved to the extent possible but dissenting opinions have been included.
· · · · · ·
Project Purpose and Alternatives II A. Project Purpose The purpose of the project is to repair or replace the Dock Street Dam and to address current deficiencies in dam safety and fish passage, while maintaining the integrity of the existing water front development and associated amenities.
II B. Identification of Alternatives The Working Group debated a range of alternatives.
The alternatives discussed were predicated on the interests of the City as indicated in the stipulation, by interests of the Working Group members but limited by the acknowledged infrastructure complexities attending higher water elevations.
The alternatives considered ranged from removing the dam to increasing the height of the dam by 6 feet to elevation 298 feet above mean sea level (amsl).
Initially, fixed crest dams were included among the alternatives considered; however, engineering expertise available to the Working Group indicated that permanently increasing the height of the dam would exacerbate
10
flooding and adversely impact facilities and structures adjacent to the river in the project area.
Alternatives that included a replacement dam at the same elevation or higher than the present dam (292 feet amsl) were specified to be inflatable dam similar to that at Shikellamy State Park in Sunbury, PA. Seven alternatives for the Dock Street Dam were selected for the detailed evaluation of impacts (Bold fact type indicates the reference to these alternatives in the discussion and analysis): Remove dam Repair at 292 feet above Replace at 292 feet amsl Replace at 294 feet amsl Replace at 296 feet amsl Replace at 298 feet amsl mean sea level (amsl) with an inflatable dam with an inflatable dam with an inflatable dam with an inflatable dam
The various replacement schemes considered are based on the concept of utilizing an inflatable, rubber dam.
The 30-year old inflatable dam project at Shikellamy State Park in Sunbury (inflatable bags were replaced in 1988 and are scheduled for periodic future replacement) provides an information source since it is located only 40 miles upstream of Harrisburg.
There are many similarities in both projects including the environmental and regulatory issues.
The Sunbury inflatable dam (Figures IIB1 
The Pennsylvania Department of Conservation and Natural Resources operates the dam and lake and it is heavily utilized for fishing and boating.
It is noteworthy that recent improvements in the Bridgestone rubber dam manufacturing process such as the recently installed automatic controls that maintain the lake level within 0.2 feet of the desired elevation have reduced the impacts along the shoreline and have enhanced the efficiency of operation.
Figure IIB1.
Sunbury Inflatable Dam Fully Elevated at High River Flow.
11
Figure II B2 Sunbury Inflatable Dam Shown Deflated on the Left and Fully Inflated Under Low River Flow on the Right.
An inflatable rubber dam consists of a sealed rubber tube fabricated from heavy-duty, nylonreinforced rubber attached to a reinforced concrete foundation with clamping lines.
The rubber material used in the dam is similar to tires for heavy construction equipment and aircraft.
It is specifically compounded to withstand ozone and ultraviolet light.
The thickness of the rubber varies from 0.4 to 0.9 inches, depending on the dam height.
The rubber body is installed on a concrete slab foundation (sill) using a simple clamping system composed of anchor bolts and upper and lower clamping plates.
This type of design results in a dependable air-tight seal and allows for quick installation.
The Bridgestone Dam (Figure IIB3) is operated by low pressure air, usually between 1 and 8 psi,
Figure IIB3.
Schematic of a Bridgestone Inflatable Dam. depending upon the height of the dam.
This feature allows the rubber dam body to be deflated and lay completely flat on the concrete sill thereby allowing water, ice, sediment and debris to freely pass over the dam.
The air is supplied by standard air blowers that allow for the dam body to be raised or lowered manually or by automatic controls.
The automatic system (in use at Sunbury) monitors one or more water-level gauges and then manipulates the air pressure in the dam to adjust the dam height and provides for the maintenance of a prescribed water level in the upstream pool.
The side slopes of the concrete abutments and piers required to support the rubber dam can have variable side slopes or can be completely vertical.
Note: The fish passage structures are envisioned as water-filled inflatable bags in series (weir
12
and pool); one at each end of dam with a length of 100 feet.
For the 292.0 elevation, there would be 2 bags (4.0' and 2.0').
For the 294.0 elevation, there would be 3 bags (6.0', 4.0' and 2.0').
For the 296.0 elevation, there would be 3 bags (8.0', 5.0' and 2.5').
For the 298.0 elevation, there would be 4 bags (10.0', 8.0', 5.0' and 2.5').
A physical hydraulic model study may be required for final design of these fish passage structures.
The rubber, inflatable dam is "state-of-the-art" technology that can be equipped to be automatically adjusted to maintain a stable pool elevation during the recreational season and completely deflated to lie flat on the sill during periods of high flow.
Such a feature has many advantages such as allowing ice to flow freely during the winter season, allowing water to pass unimpeded during flood events and allowing free fish passage early in the spring.
The cost estimates quoted in Appendix D include the cost of automatic inflation controls.
II F. Permit Requirements Any new or replacement structure constructed in the river would require the approval of one or more regulatory agencies.
The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania regulates the construction, modification and maintenance of dams under the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act 32 P.S.
The United States Army Corp of Engineers regulates the discharge of fill into waters of the United States under the provisions of Section 404 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. 1344) and the construction of dams in navigable waterways under Section 10 of the River and Harbor Act of 1899 (33 U.S.C. 403).
The Commonwealth must issue Water Quality Certification under Section 401 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C.A. 1341(a)) for activities requiring a Federal Section 404 permit.
The Susquehanna River Basin Commission would require the project to be included in its Comprehensive Plan and approved as a new project.
In addition, there are numerous permit review authorities that can recommend permit conditions or limitations.
III.
EVALUATION AND DISCUSSION
III A. City Island and Riverfront Park The development of Riverfront Park and City Island began in the early 1900's as part of what was known as the City Beautiful movement, supported by civic leaders with the goals of pure water, paved streets, and parks and playgrounds.
The initiative produced stunning results and, by 1915, most of the improvements had been accomplished.
The City had acquired almost all the property in the City bordering the Susquehanna River to form the five mile curvilinear Riverfront Park which was accentuated by the construction of a unique lower esplanade and steps leading to the river's edge.
A regional passenger light rail station is planned for City Island and is included in the initial Congressional funding authorization.
A parking structure is being designed to serve the rail facility as a fringe paring facility with service to the central Harrisburg business district, the Capital Complex, Harrisburg International Airport and other points east and west.
Harrisburg is one of the few northeastern cities in which a public park allows citizens access to nearly the entire length of the City's waterfront unfettered by railroad, limited access highway or industry.
The design of the park not only protected the City from erosion and enhanced its beauty, but engineers also designed the sewer system to connect into a large interceptor spanning the length of the park.
City Island, a 62 acre island in the Susquehanna River, was the site of the
13
City's first modern water treatment plant in 1907, drawing water from the river.
City Island is connected to Riverfront Park and the downtown area by Market Street Bridge and the "pedestrian use only" Walnut Street Bridge.
By the 1950's, the City's waterfront had begun to deteriorate.
Degradation of the river by poor water quality from inadequate sewage treatment and mining, and a declining tax base from which to support park maintenance all contributed to diminish this once magnificent resource.
By the late 1970's, improvements in environmental quality had begun to spawn a resurgent interest in the City's waterfront.
The Mayor in 1981 promised economic growth, a revitalized downtown, and major improvements to the City's greatest but neglected asset, the waterfront.
The cornerstone of the waterfront redevelopment was the return of minor league baseball to City Island, absent since the early 1950's.
In 1987 the City completed construction of Riverside Stadium, a 6400 seat facility that is home to the Harrisburg Senators, a "AA" Eastern Professional Baseball League franchise.
Soon after, the City constructed the Harrisburg Marina adapting and utilizing an abandoned water intake structure on City Island.
The abandoned and unsightly filtration plant was demolished and the Skyline Sports Complex was constructed in its place offering soccer, softball, football, lacrosse and popular sand volleyball courts.
Other enhancements include: the Pride of the Susquehanna Riverboat, Riverside Village Park provides food and beverages; overlook area and Riverview deck; a narrow gauge steam train and railroad station; a carousel; water taxis; Harbortown- a children's playground with a nautical theme; the Nature Trail featuring wetlands and wildlife; Water Golf miniature golf course; the Carriage House for horse drawn carriage rides; an Arcade; batting cages; public boat launches; a second marina known as Riverside Marina; the restored Bathhouse and Beach on the north end of the island; Riverview Pavilion; a jogging track; a Kite Shop; and a replica of the John Harris Trading Post.
A visitor's center on City Island and an abundance of decorative and interpretive signage help visitors appreciate history and culture along with the recreational value.
Riverfront Park on the river's east shore, featuring walking, cycling, jogging and fishing, has recently had major improvements in a restored upper walkway, repairs to the lower walkway, access for the physically challenged, lighting, landscaping, and a restoration of the historic Sunken Gardens.
In addition, numerous statues and monuments have been restored, and others have been donated and installed.
Amenities built since 1990 include Swenson Plaza and Kunkel Plaza.
Harrisburg's waterfront has been developed with sensitivity to the environment, in compliance with floodplain management, wetlands, water quality, and historic and cultural regulations.
Trees were carefully protected and new stock added where needed.
Aesthetic values have been preserved with underground utilities.
Old abandoned facilities have been adapted for re-use.
The historic Walnut Street Bridge has been magnificently restored and attractively lighted.
The City, in cooperation with the State, has conducted major archeological investigations of Native American occupation of City Island.
Many and varied river festivals, and special events ranging from arts and crafts to bass tournaments, mark the waterfront calendar.
City Island and Riverfront Park are a celebration of the history and culture of this region.
The City and some surrounding municipalities are cooperating on the Capital Area Greenbelt, a 20 mile beltway that includes Riverfront Park and City Island, a project initiated during the City Beautiful movement.
The waterfront now attracts more than one million visitors annually and has become the focal point of civic pride.
Approximately 250,000 people attend the Harrisburg Senators baseball
14
games each year.
The waterfront's connection to downtown development is physically and economically direct.
New and restored hotels, restaurants and other entertainment facilities are blossoming.
New business growth, private investment, and occupation of buildings is the highest in decades.
Approximately $20,000,000 in public funds has been expended on City Island and Riverfront Park, and millions more in private funds.
Many of the facilities on City Island were developed as public-private partnerships and are privately operated under lease agreements with the City.
Projects planned for the future on City Island include a restaurant/entertainment facility, an expansion and upgrade of Riverside Stadium, and the Pennsylvania Sports Hall of Fame.
III B. Sewerage/Stormwater Overflows, Manholes and Pipeline An original purpose of Dock Street Dam was to disperse combined sewage and stormwater overflows.
This remains an important function of Dock Street Dam.
There are three outfalls within the existing pool area--Mulberry, Geiger and Muench.
When the Dock Street Dam was originally constructed, a new hydraulic equilibrium would have developed between the ground water and the higher river elevations in upriver areas.
This would have included higher groundwater levels and increased flooding under high river flows.
Buildings and infrastructure development adjacent to the pooled area of the river would have been constructed with reference to the newly developed hydraulic equilibrium and flood regimes.
There are numerous manholes and miles of sewerage and stormwater pipeline adjacent to the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg.
It will be important to thoroughly evaluate these facilities for impacts of any proposed increase in water level.
Acres International in March 2000 provided the City of Harrisburg and the Working Group with a "Water Level Study" to assist with the evaluation of potential impacts of an increase in the height of the Dock Street Dam.
This study estimated impacts to manholes and sewer pipe along the river in Wormleysburg, West Fairview and the City for three proposed higher elevations of dam structure.
Although there are other buried utilities in the vicinity of the anticipated pool, it is not likely that the increased water level will have any effect on them because they are not buried as deep as the sewers.
In fact, since none are buried deeper than four feet there are no expected mitigation costs for utilities such as water, telephone, cable and electric.
If the dam elevations under consideration are limited to 292 feet amsl (current elevation), 294 feet amsl, and 296 feet amsl, than the impacts on the CSO outfalls can be discounted because these pool elevations would not affect the two northernmost outfalls.
An adjustment to the internal weir of the Mulberry outfall would probably be required.
A new dam elevation of 294 feet amsl (two feet higher than the existing dam) would have the least effect on the existing sewer lines and manholes (Table III B ).
At a flow of 50,000 cfs, there are 82 manholes and 25,841 lineal feet of sewer to be considered for mitigation to address potential inflow.
A dam elevation of 296 MSL would increase the impact to 119 manholes and 36,618 lineal feet of sewer.
This maximum pool elevation would not effect any structures on either side of the river or any other utility systems.
The preferred method of mitigation for both manholes and sewer lines is installation of a cured-in-place liner.
15
Table III B 1.
Infrastructure Mitigation Costs Associated with Increasing the Height of Dock Street Dam at three river flow levels.
(Unit Costs = *$1000/Manhole Lining, **$250/Linear Foot Sewer Lining ).
Borough of Wormleysburg Estimate of Estimate of Sewer Manholes Pipe Impacted Impacted* (Apx.
Linear Ft)** Dam EL 294 1,700 cfs 10,000 cfs 50,000 cfs Dam EL 296 1,700 cfs 10,000 cfs 50,000 cfs Dam EL 298 1,700 cfs 10,000 cfs 50,000 cfs 0 1 2 $0 $1,000 $2,000 0 200 450 $0 $ 50,000 $112,500 Borough of West Fairview Estimate of Estimate of Sewer Manholes Pipe Impacted Impacted* (Apx.
Linear Ft)** 0 2 5 $0 $2,000 $5,000 0 1,000 1,391 $0 $250,000 $347,750 Estimate of Manholes Impacted* 30 50 75 City of Harrisburg Estimate of Sewer Pipe Impacted (Apx.
Linear Ft)** 10,000 16,000 24,000 $2,500,000 $4,000,000 $6,000,000 Total Cost
$30,000 $50,000 $75,000
2,530,000 4,353,000 6,542,250
0 3 6 1 4 12
$0 $3,000 $6,000 $1,000 $4,000 $12,000
0 300 704 100 600 1,144
$0 $ 75,000 $176,000 $ 25,000 $150,000 $286,000
4 6 8 6 8 11
$4,000 $6,000 $8,000 $6,000 $8,000 $11,000
991 1,400 1,914 1,759 2,100 2,622
$247,750 $350,000 $478,500 $439,750 $525,000 $655,500
60 80 105 90 115 135
$60,000 $80,000 $105,000 $90,000 $115,000 $135,000
19,000 25,000 34,000 29,000 36,000 44,000
$4,750,000 $6,500,000 $8,500,000 $7,250,000 $9,000,000 $11,000,000
5,061,750 7,068,000 9,273,500 7,811,750 9,802,000 12,099,500
III C. Present Condition of Dock Street Dam The Dock Street Dam was constructed in1913 at an average height of four feet above the river bed and an overall length of approximately 3100 feet.
The existing dam structure consists of 285 solid concrete piers, 10 feet on center, anchored to the riverbed.
Pre-cast concrete planks are laid across the sloping piers, perpendicular to the flow of the water.
The tops of the piers are tied together with cast-in-place concrete beams that are rounded to facilitate the flow of water.
The piers, crest beams, and pre-cast slabs were constructed across the width of the river, except for about 160 feet on the west-end where a solid concrete weir was constructed.
Two low flow openings were left in the dam.
The City of Harrisburg funded a 1964 project to repair the dam.
This project was the first repair of the dam undertaken since it was constructed.
By 1964, at least 61 planks had been washed out or damaged by flooding or ice and the toes of 51 piers, including one stretch of 400 feet between 800 and 1200 feet from the east shore had been undermined.
The repairs consisted of replacement of the missing and damaged planks and repair of the pier structures at the toes.
According to records available in PADEP, repairs were halted about two thirds of the way across the river from the east shore to the west shore.
The part of the dam that was not repaired, as indicated in the original drawings, included only six slabs and no toe repairs was probably not significant at that time.
Construction of a planned fish ladder, however, was deleted because sufficient funds were not available.
There is no current engineering assessment of the condition of Dock Street Dam.
An inspection of the dam was planned for the fall of 1999, but the river elevation rose to a point where it was not safe for persons to enter the water to approach the dam.
The water elevation did not fall sufficiently to allow safe entry into the water during the entire summer season of 2000.
It is fair to assume, however, that damage has occurred to the dam in the 36 years that have elapsed since the 1964 partial repairs were made which might be similar to the damage that occurred in the
16
first 51 years.
There has been record-setting severity in river conditions since 1964 including flooding in 1972, 1975 and flooding with attendant ice flows in 1993 and 1996.
III D. Dam Safety and Liability There are two general categories of dam safety issues.
First, there is the safety "of" the dam as it relates to the responsible operation, maintenance and inspection of its structural elements so that there is an adequate margin of safety against collapse or failure of the dam.
Dam failure with the attendant uncontrolled release of the reservoir behind the dam would threaten lives and property below the dam.
These safety issues fall under the purview of the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act.
In the case of the Dock Street Dam, the threat to life and property due to a sudden failure of the dam is minimal and DEP considers it to be a Size Classification C, Hazard Potential category 3 (Non-high hazard) structure as it is defined in the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act.
Thus, the principal safety issue of concern to DEP is the continued maintenance of the dam structure and its appurtenances necessary to prevent any deterioration, collapse or other structural deficiencies that would constitute a hazard or attractive nuisance to persons in the vicinity of the dam.
DEP requires dam owners to correct deficient items.
Also, regular inspections are mandated so a dam owner may identify all problems and correct them.
The second category of dam safety issues is safety "at" the dam.
These issues relate to general site safety and the particularly hazardous conditions associated with the hydraulic backwash at run-of-river dams.
These safety issues do not fall under the purview of the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act but are a legal responsibility of the dam owner as defined in Act 91-1998.
The dam owner is responsible for making and keeping the premises safe.
The general rule is that a dam owner must avoid conduct or conditions which could injure any person, even one who trespasses.
If the dam owner knows that an unsafe condition exists, he is responsible to correct it and/or post warnings.
The safety and liability issues at the existing Dock Street Dam are threefold: general site liability associated with the physical dam structure and the water-body impounded by the dam, the likelihood of advanced deterioration and instability of the dam structure, and the hazardous hydraulic backwash below the dam.
III E. Boating and other water related activities Determining the capacity of a body of water for boating recreation is an inexact science.
For the most part, the number of boats that can be used on a particular body of water is a function of what the users expect and will tolerate.
Recreational carrying capacity is viewed as consisting of two components: · Social Capacity: the level of recreational use of a resource or area beyond which the user's expectation of the experience is not realized and he/she does not achieve a reasonable level of satisfaction.
Resource Capacity: the level of recreational use of a resource beyond which substantial biological deterioration takes place or degradation of the physical environment makes the resource no longer suitable or attractive for that recreational use.
·
17
The optimum recreational carrying capacity is the level of use that does not exceed an area's resource capacity or social capacity.
This recreational capacity is less than the theoretical limit created simply by using boat operation dynamics.
There are a number of models used to determine social carrying capacity.
For the purposes of the following information, a model developed for Deep Creek Lake in western Maryland was used.
This model uses a figure of 1.4 acres per boat or roughly 250 feet of buffer between boats used for fishing and general boating activities exclusive of water skiing.
This number represents the distance between boats at which Deep Creek Lake boaters would feel comfortable.
The models developed in the ACRES report identify the "useable boating water" as water with a depth of three feet.
This is not considered sufficiently deep for safe water skiing.
The amount of water surface acreage that is of sufficient depth (five feet or more) to allow safe water skiing is not known at this time and will require additional study.
If water skiing is to be possible within the pool, we should assume that water skiing would be restricted by regulation to a very small portion of the pool.
For the purposes of this report, we will assume that water skiing will be a very minor activity and will not be included in these capacity calculations.
To calculate the recreational carrying capacity, the acreage of usable boating water is divided by area/density guideline figure (1.4 acres per boat) to arrive at a total number of boats the available water is capable of supporting.
This is the estimated recreational carrying capacity of that particular area of boating water.
The workgroup estimated the boating acreage created at various dam elevations at 10,000 cfs flow.
The acreage was adjusted for the general boating rule that creates a slow no wake zone within 100 feet of any shoreline.
Additional acreage from the "no boating" area above the dam and the areas used by marinas was also subtracted.
Numerous bridges bisect the pool and the acreage around them was deleted from the active boating pool.
While these slow no wake zones are not considered boating waters for the purposes of this analysis, they are still boating waters and may be used for still fishing and other sedentary activities.
In order to arrive at a more precise estimate of actual capacity, additional detailed study will need to be conducted based on different mixes of boating activities.
For the purposes of this report, however, and given the limitations described above, the carrying capacity of the various pool sizes are calculated as follows: 1) 2) 3) 4) 5) 6) 7) No Action Removal Repair -- same height Replace -- same height Inflatable Crest 294' Inflatable Crest 296' Inflatable Crest 298' 800 acres )1.4 = see footnote same as 1) same as 1) 1000 acres )1.4 1500 acres )1.4 2250 acres )1.4 571 boats
= 714 boats = 1071 boats = 1607 boats
These numbers are only applicable if the current type of boating, i.e. pontoon, small fishing boat and non-powered boating is maintained.
Any significant introduction of high speed boating such as personal watercraft or ski boats would greatly impact the capacity of this body of water and would require further assessment.
18
In June 2000, a physical count of boats moored on the Harrisburg Pool was undertaken.
At that time, 377 pontoon boats, 40 personal watercraft and 20 Jon boats or a total of 437 boats were counted.
These boats were moored in the marinas at City Island and in Wormleysburg, and at individual moorings along the west shore of the river to West Fairview.
Additionally, the two boat launches at City Island and West Fairview have the capacity to put about 100 additional boats on the pool.
Studies show that a typical marina will have less that 35% of its boats in use at any one time.
Based on this, the Harrisburg Pool is currently at about 34 % of capacity on any given boating day.
(537 x 35% = 187 boats).
Using these assumptions, it was possible to determine excess boating capacity on the Dock Street Dam pool.
Table 3 A 1.
Potential excess for each of the alternative dam heights.
Alternative No action Remove Repair 294' 296' 298' Potential Current inCapacity use Population 800 571 187 See note1 800 571 187 1000 714 187 1500 1071 187 2250 1607 187 Acres Excess Capacity 384 384 527 884 1420
Most of the current access to the pool is obtained through marinas.
The two small public boat launches at West Fairview and City Island have a combined capacity of about 100 boats.
In order to reach the potential capacity of the above-discussed scenarios, a significant infrastructurebuilding project would have to be undertaken.
City Island offers some potential for expanded boat launching and marina facility expansion.
The Harrisburg City shoreline provides no opportunities because it is almost entirely bordered by Commercial offices, Riverfront Park and Front Street.
On the West Shore, Front Street and residential properties parallel the river.
The potential to develop significant boat launching facilities is limited here.
The Wormleysburg shore provides some additional potential for development of on-river marinas but space available for parking and other shore side facilities are limiting factors.
Thus, reaching the carrying capacity is an unlikely scenario in any of the alternatives.
There is substantial use of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg for non-power recreational boating by members and clients of several organizations and businesses, principally canoes and tubing.
The estimated numbers of participants approaches 6,000 annually.
At least two liveries provide an opportunity for people to rent canoes for use on this section of the Susquehanna River.
Additionally, the Dauphin County Parks and Recreation Department provides about 400 non-power boat trips annually.
These trips are divided among several events: · · · · 1
Root Beer Float - (inner tubes) - 200 Historic Canoe Float - 60 Breakfast Canoe and River Appreciation - 30 Teacher Training Canoe Program - 40
With the removal of the dam, the use of motorboats would be greatly limited.
Boating use would be restricted to unpowered boats, canoes and shallow draft boats equipped with jet motors.
Most of the boats in the current marinas would be eliminated.
19
· ·
Huck Finn Program (Middle School Students) canoeing and camping - 20 Susquehanna Saturday Canoe - 50
The Harrisburg Canoe Club sponsors formal trips, with about 60 participants, per weekend from April to October.
Annually, their activities result in about 2000 canoe trips.
In addition, they offer paddling courses for canoeists and kayakers.
Inner City Outings takes students from the urban environment out on the river for canoeing and camping experiences.
The Audubon Society, the Chesapeake Bay Foundation and the Alliance for the Chesapeake conduct canoe trips for members, students, the general public, and canoe based professional development courses for teachers.
The raising of the pool elevation would impact the area currently used for their activities and increasing the number of motorboats would potentially drive canoeists to other areas.
Staff at the Wildwood Lake Nature Center indicated that they use the West Fairview access to avoid motorboats near City Island.
When City Island is used to exit the river, additional precautions must now be taken for the safety of participants.
These include having the canoes "raft up" and stay close to the island to avoid motorboats.
A larger and deeper pool with more and higher speed motorboats would create greater safety hazards for canoes to overcome.
The Susquehanna River Trails Association estimates that from 200-500 participants use the River Trail annually.
Because the River Trail is a relatively new program in the last three years, the number of participants is anticipated to grow substantially as word of the opportunities gets out.
Three islands in the proposed project area would be affected negatively by higher water levels.
A raised water level would allow additional motorboats to enter in to the area currently limited to canoes and other non-powered boats.
This additional boating activity would intrude on the solitude surrounding these islands and impact on the experience.
Statistics on deaths at the Dock Street dam reveals that there were two fatal accidents in twenty years from people going over the current dock street dam.
Eight fatalities (8) occurred as a result of people coming too close to the dam from down-river.
Besides the obvious danger of the current dam, recreational boating use in the pool created by the dam does not present a significant safety problem.
No deaths or significant injuries have occurred in boating accidents that were not directly related to the dam itself.
Most of the accidents that occur in the pool are the result of grounding in shallow water.
The additional depth that would be created by a new higher dam would eliminate much of this danger and provide for a much more enjoyable boating experience.
However, the introduction of additional boats would increase the probability of accidents simply because of the increased recreational activity.
Additional law enforcement and educational resources will need to be directed to the users of this impoundment.
The City must also be concerned about minimizing conflicts between user groups.
There are two major groups of user conflicts: boater-boater and boater-shore side user.
Between these two groups are many sub-groups each of which will have to be addressed in the city's proposal.
Two issues are paramount in any discussion of conflicts: noise and safety.
The limited boating waters and access to the Harrisburg Pool creates a unique situation.
Users have made the pontoon boat the primary vehicle for enjoyment of the Susquehanna River.
This use has resulted in a sense of peace and tranquility.
High-speed thrill operation is not the norm for this body of water or its users.
The Harrisburg Pool is used primarily for families to get away from the stress of everyday life, to meet with friends and enjoy the solitude of boating.
This is a characteristic of this area
20
that should be encouraged and promoted.
Any proposed development needs to accommodate the traditional boating community on the pool.
This will require consultation with regulatory agencies to develop appropriate regulations and policies that will prevent the growth of undesirable types of boating while at the same time encourage the growth of the desired types.
The ultimate goal of any management plan should be to maximize boating opportunities and minimize resource impacts.
Management techniques exist to accomplish these goals and should be developed very early in the project planning process.
Various approaches have been made and are being used to deal with carrying capacity and boater conflicts.
Most current approaches involve several common features: 1) the establishment of management objectives, 2) the determination of standards and use levels, 3) the identification and use of indicators, 4) the application of management techniques and 5) ongoing monitoring.
Utilizing these techniques, the City, in cooperation with the state resource agencies, most notably the Fish and Boat Commission, can, and must, effectively develop a management plan that satisfies the various users of any impoundment selected as a result of this study process.
III F. Water Quality The Susquehanna River had been monitored chemically at Water Quality Network Station 202 that was located at the Walnut Street Bridge in Harrisburg.
Benthic macroinvertebrate sampling was conducted out from the mouth of Conodoguinet Creek beyond the influence of the Conodoguinet.
Both of these sites are upstream from the existing Dock Street Dam.
Sampling at these locations was discontinued in 1995.
Summarized briefly below is an overview of the water quality of the river based on samples collected monthly from February 1994 to February 1995.
The salient water quality issues are seasonally transient and are most severe in low flow conditions during warm summer months.
The Susquehanna River is classified as a Warm Water Fishery.
Overall, water quality typically meets state water quality standards.
During the sampling period the range of dissolved oxygen readings was from 8.5 mg/l to 13.6 mg/l.
The minimum state criterion is 4 mg/l.
It should be noted though that violations of this standard were recorded during a survey of the river downstream from Conodoguinet Creek in 1990.
Excessive algal growths and algal respiration in the river below the Conodoguinet due to discharges from sewage treatment plants and low water velocities in Conodoguinet Creek caused early morning oxygen sags to less than 2 mg/l along the west shore in the mixing zone.
During the 1994 sampling period, river temperatures generally met the monthly state criterion which ranges from a low of 40oF to a high of 87oF.
The river temperature exceeded the criterion by a few degrees during the months of February, March, April, and December with a maximum exceedance of 6 degrees and a minimum of 2 degrees.
The nitrate plus nitrite nitrogen criterion of 10 mg/l was never exceeded and was typically less than 1.0 mg/l.
Higher concentrations (maximum of 1.1) were recorded during higher flow events.
Total phosphorus ranged from 0.03 to 0.17 mg/l with the higher readings also occurring during high flows; moderate enrichment was indicated with the average concentration of 0.07 mg/l.
21
Total heavy metals (copper, iron, lead, nickel, zinc, and aluminum) overall met state criteria.
Iron and aluminum were typically higher during high flow with attendant higher turbidity situations suggesting that these metals were tied up in the suspended sediments.
Two measures of the health of the macro-invertebrate community are total number of taxa (species) and total number of EPT taxa.
EPT taxa represent Ephemeroptera (mayflies), Plecoptera (stoneflies), and Trichoptera (caddisflies) which are typically more sensitive to pollution.
In 1993 the total number of taxa was 38 with an EPT total of 19.
In 1994 the total number of taxa as 37 with an EPT total of 14.
These values reflect good to excellent water quality.
The magnificent hatches of mayflies during the spring and summer months also attest to the good water quality conditions in the river.
Concerns about low dissolved oxygen in the Conodoguinet Creek mixing zone and bacteria levels from CSO's would increase with proposed higher replacement dams.
III G. Fisheries III G 1.
Fish Passage The City of Harrisburg has included improving fish passage as one of its goals for the Dock Street Dam.
The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission has indicated that they expect to recommend provision of fish passage be a condition of any permit applications that the City of Harrisburg might submit to maintain, rebuild or relocate the Dock Street Dam.
American shad and other migratory fish such as blueback herring, alewife, hickory shad, American eel and striped bass were blocked from upriver spawning and nursery areas in the Susquehanna River with construction of the Holtwood Hydroelectric Dam in 1910; ultimately, four hydropower dams were developed on the lower Susquehanna River.
Historically, the migrations of American shad in the Susquehanna River were the largest within their native range on the East Coast of North American.
The runs of anadromous fish were enormously important to the economies of the early settlers and continue to be economically important fisheries where runs of migratory fish have been sustained today.
After more than 40 years of study and negotiation, shad and other migratory fish restoration on the Susquehanna began to see fruition with the signing of the "1993 Settlement Agreement for the Development of fish passage facilities at the Holtwood, Safe Harbor, York Haven Projects on the Susquehanna River."
In 1991,a new fish lift at the Conowingo Dam was installed to pass migratory fish over the dam.
The 1993 agreement, signed by the governors of Pennsylvania, Maryland and New York as well as the various fisheries agencies and fishery interests, provided for fish passage at the three upstream hydroelectric dams by the year 2000.
Those fish passage facilities have been constructed and are operating at the four hydropower dams down river from Harrisburg.
A goal of the Susquehanna River migratory fish restoration effort is to pass two million American shad upstream of York Haven Dam; most of these fish would be expected to reach the Dock Street Dam.
22
Adult American shad migrating in the Susquehanna River have been documented in upriver areas where they would have had to pass the existing Dock Street Dam.
Trucking American shad captured at Conowingo Dam fish lifts to a release site at Tri-County Marina was conducted from 1982 through 1999; Tri-County Marina is located upriver of York Haven Dam and the other three lower river hydropower dams but down-river from Dock Street Dam.
Adult American shad were collected in the Juniata River at Mifflintown in 1987 as well as other years and at the Shikallamy State Park Inflatable Dam at Sunbury (r.m. 125) in 1997, 1998, and 2000.
Collections of wild juvenile American shad in upriver areas every year from 1993 through 1998 provides further evidence that adult American shad pass Dock Street Dam in its present condition.
The extent to which Dock Street Dam, in its present condition, impedes shad migration or under what river flow conditions the dam blocks migrations is not known.
Hydraulic modeling suggests that velocities over the dam at low flows (less than 40,000 cubic feet per second) may impede or block shad migrations.
On average, flows less than 40,000 cfs occur about 35% of the time in April, 65% of the time in May and 85% of the time in June.
The low head (avg. 5 feet, range 4-10 feet) of Dock Street Dam and the particular hydraulic conditions immediately downstream of the dam are such that at high river flows the dam is awash and fish passage along its 3100 feet length should not be impeded.
As river flows decrease, however, the difference in elevation of the water between the pool and the tailwater below the dam (known as the head differential) increases and the shad migration upriver would be delayed or blocked.
Hydraulic modeling has suggested that with a six feet high dam river flows below 40,000 cubic feet per second would generate velocities unfavorable to shad passage.
Two low flow notches were included in the Dock Street Dam, one on the east bank and one on the west bank.
It is unclear whether it was intended that fish use the notches for passageways or whether the notches were left for the installation of passageways at a later time.
In addition to the two notches, deterioration of Dock Street Dam has resulted in breaching to varying degrees; at least one of which is comparable to or exceeds the size of the notches.
Operation and Design considerations for Fish Passage: · · · · American shad and river herring are the target species for fish passage at the Dock Street Dam.
Adult American shad and river herring should be expected from April 1 through June 30 The goal for passage is about 2,000,000 American shad and 15,000,000 river herring with about 6% passing on the peak day.
American shad have long duration cruising speed of 3.5 feet per second for hours, can sustain swimming speeds of 3.5 to 8 feet per second for several minutes and can achieve burst or darting swimming speeds exceeding 10 feet per second for several seconds.
Swimming speeds for herring range from 0 to 7 fps maximum, with sustained speeds approaching 5 fps.
American shad and river herring do not jump anything; they are not like salmon.
They need 18 -24 inches water depth in which to swim and should not be expected to ascend more than 18 inches at intervals.
A minimum of two passageways are needed at the Dock Street Dam; however, to improve fish passage over present conditions more than two would be needed.
The river at Harrisburg has laterally stratified river flow, meaning the flows from tributaries including the Juniata River are not mixed across the width of the river; thus, American shad, homing to natal tributary streams and rivers, will prefer to be in that water when they detect it.
· ·
23
· ·
USFWS Fish Passage Hydraulic Engineers have offered their assistance in evaluating any proposed structural fish passage facilities.
Hydraulic modeling, possibly including a scaled down physical prototype, will be essential for evaluating fish passage facilities.
A major fishery concern with a higher replacement dam at Dock Street is that the goal of improving fish passage will be more difficult and expensive to achieve.
Fish passageways that reduce fish passage efficiency would adversely impact the effectiveness of the shad restoration program on the Susquehanna River.
However, fish passageways that would assure fish passage under low flow conditions would be expected to improve fish passage at the Dock Street Dam.
However, with an inflatable dam, it may be possible to both control the openings to maintain a recreation pool, and at the same time, allow fish passage through the openings.
If this is not feasible, then some fish passage structure would be necessary.
Because this issue is so critical in the discussion of possible alternatives to the existing Dock Street Dam, the Susquehanna River Basin Commission offered its technical expertise to review this matter.
The Susquehanna River Basin Commission provided computer hydraulic modeling of water velocities under various scenarios to determine if it would be possible to leave deflated one or more bags in an inflatable dam design for the provision of fish passage while maintaining the recreational boating pool elevation.
The report from the Susquehanna River Basin Commission (SRBC) is summarized below.
Inflatable dams ranging in height from 6 feet to 10 feet were analyzed.
The dam was assumed to contain mostly 300-foot inflatable bags units, with smaller units, if needed, to control various flows in the recreation season.
Assumptions for the swimming performance of shad and herring were those listed above under design considerations.
The critical time period determined for American shad passing Harrisburg is from April 1 to June 30 of each year.
High river flows could delay raising the inflatable bags but it is expected that boating interests will want a stable recreational pool as soon as possible and no later than May 15.
Migrating fish arriving before the bags are inflated would find an essentially free flowing river.
Flows ranging from 5,000 cubic feet per second (exceeded 96 percent of the time in June) to 60,000 cfs (exceeded 5 % of the time in June) were investigated.
At higher flows (above 40,000 cfs), for a 6 foot dam, shad and herring should be able to pass over the main bags without needing assistance from a fish passage facility.
This is due to the higher backwater that would occur below the dam at these flows.
However, at flows below 40,000 cfs some hydraulic assistance for fish passage will be required.
Opening the Dam (Bags deflated) The first scenario investigated by SRBC was passing fish by lowering (or not raising) some of the inflatable bags in the spring of the year when the adult shad and herring would be migrating upstream to spawn.
24
The opening would have to be reduced to 150 feet in order to pass 5,000 cfs while still maintaining a 6-foot pool behind the dam.
As flow increases, the size of the opening would have to be increased proportionately to maintain recreational pool at 6 feet while preventing flood of riparian areas.
However, difference in height between the upstream pool and downstream tailwater level controls the flow velocity through the opening and dictates the required swimming speed for successful fish passage.
The head differentials increase as flows decrease.
At low flows of 5,000 cfs, flow velocities through the bags were found to range from 10 to 12 fps.
These flow velocities are too high for reliable fish passage.
For dams higher than 6 feet, flow velocities in the openings would be even higher.
Thus, dropping bags or not inflating bags to provide fish passage while maintaining the recreational boating pool is not feasible for successful fish passage.
Stepped Inflatable Dam System It has been suggested that a fish passage facility designed for a proposed Wilkes-Barre inflatable dam could be adapted to the Dock Street Project.
This proposal includes a series of stepped inflatable bags, of incrementally higher elevations, for the sections adjacent both of the rivers' banks.
The inflated bags would be constructed in parallel series in a concrete channel and be spaced about 30 feet apart in order to allow resting pools for the fish.
These bags would be filled with water to provide stability and prevent bag damage from vibrations during raising and lowering the bags.
The fish passage facility should extend upstream of the main bags of the dam in order that the fish can find the fish passage device while swimming along the base of the dam.
Velocities through such a structure were analyzed for various flows and dam heights.
Assuming a 6-foot main dam height, a 5-foot upstream and 3-foot intermediate inflatable bag combination gives satisfactory hydraulic conditions for fish passage.
Under this scenario, total water depth over the 5-foot bag section ranges from 1.55 feet at river flows of 5,000 cfs to 4 feet at flows of 50,000 cfs.
Flow velocities within the stepped inflatable structure range from 3.5 fps to 5.57 fps, and fall well within the sustainable swimming speed for both American shad and herring.
Higher dam height would require more intermediate inflatable bags within the passage channel.
While a stepped inflatable bag system for fish passage has never been constructed or field verified, Ben Rizzo of the U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service's Engineering Field Office in Newton, Mass. is confident that this type of system will effectively pass shad within a one-hour time frame.
Mr. Rizzo has considerable experience in the design and construction of fish passage facilities, and has been involved in the development of all fish passage facilities for the four lower Susquehanna River hydropower dams.
However, as with any newly proposed hydraulic design for a fish passage device, it is recommended that the stepped inflatable bag system be laboratory tested using a physical hydraulic model.
Hydraulic model runs should be conducted to test the feasibility of successful fish passage for inflatable dam heights up to 10 feet.
This should be achievable by adding one or more additional stepped inflatable bags in the series.
25
SRBC staff has not estimated costs associated with the fish passage device investigated.
However, staff expects that this type of fish passage device will be considerably less expensive than a conventional fish ladder.
Improving fish passage at Dock Street Dam will be a challenge.
If, as the hydraulic model suggests, Dock Street Dam in its present condition is a significant impediment or blockage to shad migration at low river flows, it will be imperative to improve fish passage under any future condition of Dock Street Dam. III G 2.
Fishes and Fishing Acres International Corporation (1994) reported collecting a combined total of 46 species of fish and one hybrid fish by electrofishing, seining, gill netting and trap netting in the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg during the years 1986, 1991 and 1992.
Minnows (collectively 16 fish species excluding carp) were the most abundant fishes, followed by smallmouth bass and rock bass.
Projecting probable changes in this complex fish community structure due to sequential increases in the height of Dock Street Dam is fraught with uncertainties; especially, if an inflatable dam option were used and the dam were deflated at high flows creating an essentially free flowing river.
In general, however, with a higher dam under the summer low flow fish reproductive period, the river will become more like a shallow lake in its habitat characteristics; thus, favoring a shift, perhaps subtle, to fish species with preferences for lake like environments.
Shown in Table III C 2-1 are some indications of the types of changes that might be expected to occur in four selected fish species.
While there could be differences in opinions about the impact of changing the dam height on life stages of individual fish species, the main point is that some fish species will find the larger lake-like habitat more favorable for some or all life stages and other fish species will not.
There will continue to be a very diverse fish community that will be dominated by fish species tolerant of the variable habitat conditions.
Table III C 2-1.
Expected changes in suitability of the impounded area of Dock Street Dam at higher dam elevations (0=no change, - = less favorable, + = more favorable).
FISH SPECIES Smallmouth Bass Channel cat American Shad Gizzard shad Carp
LIFE STAGE Spawning Nursery Adult Spawning Nursery Adult Spawning Nursery Adult Spawning Nursery Adult Spawning
NO ACTION 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
REMOVE DAM + + + + + + + + -
292' REPAIR/ REPLACE
294' DAM + + 0 + + + +
296' DAM + + 0 + + + +
298' DAM + + 0 + + + +
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
26
FISH SPECIES
LIFE STAGE Nursery Adult
NO ACTION 0 0
REMOVE DAM -
292' REPAIR/ REPLACE
294' DAM + +
296' DAM + +
298' DAM + +
0 0
Smallmouth bass were overwhelmingly the dominant sport fish species in the river and, overwhelmingly, the fish species most frequently caught and harvested by anglers on the river.
Impacts to the smallmouth bass population that might result from changes in the dam height are important to sport anglers who fish the river near Harrisburg.
Based on a habitat suitability assessment, it could be inferred from Acres International 1994 report that smallmouth bass spawning and nursery habitat would decrease and adult habitat would increase with a higher dam.
The 1994 Acres International Report also included the results of recreational fishing assessment on seven reaches of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg (Table III C 2-2) totaling about 9 miles of river.
Table III C 2-2.
Description of the Recreational Fishing Survey Areas on the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg [shaded rows denote fully (darker) or partially (less dark) impounded reaches].
AREA A B C D E F G Description Down stream of Dam 7,000 feet Dam to Harvey Taylor (HT) bridge HT bridge to 1000' ups W. Fairview Access Ups W.Fairview access to Dns tip of McCormicks Is.
Dns tip of McCormick Is.
To I-81 bridge I-81 bridge to Rockville RR bridge Rockville bridge to 3,600 ups of Fort Hunter Boat Access ShorelineFeet 14,000 24,000** 11,000 15,200 12,400 15,000 13,000 Acreage * 494 547* 537 700 561* 642 554
* Estimated major island surface area was removed from river area between the banks.
** Includes the 8000 foot shoreline of City Island
The survey results showed the hours of three types of fish in each survey reach (Table III C 2-3).
The total fishing effort was nearly 85,000 hours on the combined seven areas.
Table III C 2-3.
Hours of fishing on reaches of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg June 1986 to May 1987 (shaded rows denote fully (darker) or partially (less dark) impounded reaches.
AREA A B C D E F G Description Down stream of Dam 7,000 feet Dam to Harvey Taylor (HT) bridge HT bridge to 1000' ups W. Fairview access Ups W.Fairview access to Dns tip of McCormicks Is.
Dns McCormick Is.
To I-81 bridge I-81 bridge to Rockville RR bridge Rockville bdg to 3,600 ups of Fort Hunter Access Bank Fishing Hours 13,390 8,171 2,360 406 770 2,995 4,898 Wade fishing Hours 2,707 178 457 406 42 1,454 998 Boat fishing Hours 7,892 6,310 3,900 1,404 2,588 8,213 15,065 Total fishing Hours 23,989 14,659 6,717 2,216 3,400 12,661 20,961
A standardized basis was used to compare the different fishing rates among the seven river reaches surveyed (Table III C 2-4).
Boat fishing hours and the total fishing hours were divided by the acreage in each reach to produce hours of fishing per acres for comparison among the
27
seven reaches.
Likewise, hours of fishing from the banks and hours of fishing by wading were divided by the length of shoreline in each river reach to provide comparisons.
Table III C 2-4.
Fishing rates on reaches of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg, June 1986 to May 1987 [shaded rows denote fully (darker) or partially (less dark) impounded reaches].
AREA Description Bank fishing hrs/100 ft of shore 96 34 21 3 6 20 38 Wade fishing Hrs/100 ft of shore 19 0.7 4 3 0.3 10 8 Boat fishing hours/ acre 16 12 7 2 5 12 27 Total fishing hours/ acre 49 26 12 3 6 19 38
A B C D E F G
Down stream of Dam 7,000 feet Dam to Harvey Taylor (HT) bridge HT bridge to 1000' ups W. Fairview access Ups W.Fairview access to Dns tip of McCormicks Is.
Dns McCormick Is.
To I-81 bridge I-81 bridge to Rockville RR bridge Rockville bdg to 3,600 ups of Fort Hunter Access
These results show that average boat fishing rate (hrs/acre) was higher (12.4 hrs/acre) on the free flowing river reaches then it was on the river reaches that were impounded (9.5 hr/acre).
The boat fishing rate was greatest on two reaches of the river that were not impound (A
Wade fishing was higher in the free flowing river (8.06 hours/100 ft of shoreline) than on the impounded areas (2.35 hour/100 feet); also, bank fishing was slightly higher on the free flowing river (32.6 hr/100 ft) than on the impounded reaches (27.5 hr/100 ft).
It might be reasoned that the rate of fishing depends primarily on the availability of access to the river and the quality of smallmouth bass fishing.
The number of smallmouth bass caught by anglers divided by the time the anglers spend fishing provides a standardized catch per hour fished thus providing for comparisons of the smallmouth bass fishing among river reaches (Table III C 2-5).
These results show that average smallmouth bass catch per hour (1.67 bass/hr) was higher on the free flow river reaches than it was on the impounded river reaches (0.99 bass/hr).
Table III C 2-5.
Observed catch of smallmouth bass per angler hour on the Susquehanna River April through October, 1989 [shaded rows denote fully (darker) or partially (less dark) impounded reaches].
AREA A B C D E F G Description Down stream (dns) of Dam 7,000 feet Dam to Harvey Taylor (HT) bridge HT bridge to 1000' ups of West Fairview boat access Ups of W.Fairview access to Dns tip of McCormicks Is.
Dns McCormick Is.
To I 81 bridge I 81 bridge to Rockville RR bridge Rockville bridge to 3,600 ups of Fort Hunter Boat Access Hours fishing 618 414 413 260 295 461 456 Smallmouth Catch 954 393 427 637 508 813 411 Catch/ Hour 1.54 0.95 1.03 2.44 1.72 1.76 0.90
These results suggest that if the Dock Street Dam is raised the following can be expected in the impounded area: 1.
Boat fishing could increase; but only if more boat anglers can and want to get onto the water.
28
2.
Wade fishing will decrease.
3.
Bank fishing will be unchanged.
4.
Angler catch rate of small mouth bass (bass caught per hour of fishing) will decrease.
The City's Position on Smallmouth Bass One of the City's goals and objectives is to protect or enhance the abundant natural resources of the river, including the important smallmouth bass fishery.
The City of Harrisburg agrees that the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg is an excellent smallmouth bass fishery.
With a fishery of this outstanding quality, it is appropriate that any proposed changes to the environment be reviewed with caution.
With this in mind, the City does understand the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission's concerns about the potential impacts of increasing dam heights on the resource.
However, in assessing the potential impacts of increasing the dam crest height 2 or 4 feet, the City believes that the majority of factors indicate that these relatively minor increases should not adversely affect the smallmouth bass fishery.
In support of its position, the City has employed a number of techniques to assess the potential effect on increasing impoundment size on smallmouth bass and other fish species.
The City recognizes that any method to predict future changes in biological systems has weaknesses, but significant efforts have been made to address these issues.
One method is to compare the fish populations in the Harrisburg area to that of an already existing impoundment.
The City undertook extensive field electrofishing investigations in 1986 in the Harrisburg area and reviewed the results of prior studies done in the York Haven impoundment from 1977-1985.
Including the 1986 studies done by the City, walleye, channel catfish, rock bass, crappie, pumpkinseed, and bluegill comprised a greater percentage of the total catch in York Haven than in the Harrisburg area.
The percentage of smallmouth bass taken in York Haven was equal to that in the Harrisburg area.
The City continued the electrofishing studies in 1991, including 5 sampling stations in York Haven and 9 in the Harrisburg area.
A comparison of selected fish species collected in each respective area is as follows: during nighttime collections 48 smallmouth bass were collected and 30 more observed during 46 minutes of electrofishing in York Haven (101.7/hr), while 23 were collected and 33 were observed during 82 minutes of electrofishing in the Harrisburg area (40.9/hr); 24 walleye were taken and 7 observed (40.4/hr) in York Haven vs. none taken or observed in the Harrisburg reach; 51 rock bass and 22 redbreast sunfish were collected in York Haven while 6 rock bass and no redbreast sunfish were collected in the Harrisburg reach.
Also, more carp and quillback were collected in the Harrisburg reach than at York Haven in the 1991 samples.
It is worth noting that the York Haven impoundment is considerably more "lake-like" than any of the current proposals for the Harrisburg area would be, and therefore the "accuracy" of predictions extrapolated from York Haven to future fish populations in the Harrisburg area is less than ideal.
However, there is no indication based on these comparisons that the smallmouth bass fishery would be degraded by a 2 to 4 foot increase in the dam crest at Harrisburg, nor is it expected that major shifts in species composition would occur.
In addition, to the field sampling described above, the City also applied a technique known as the Instream Flow Incremental Methodology (IFIM) to predict the suitability of the habitat
29
associated with the proposed hydroelectric project for American shad, smallmouth bass, channel catfish, and gizzard shad.
The IFIM methodology was developed for the United States Fish and Wildlife Service for the purpose of creating a quantitative method of assessing changes in habitat for selected species.
In response to agency concerns, the City did not use published species criteria curves for smallmouth bass.
Scuba diving studies were conducted during 1989 and 1991 to collect data on smallmouth bass in the Susquehanna River to verify the species criteria curves.
The IFIM model produces an index of habitat known as Weighted Usable Area (WUA) for each species and life stage.
An analysis of the results of this study was reported in 1993 for four different reservoir levels, the lowest of which was elevation 302.5, considerably higher than the current alternatives examined by the working group.
However, the trends indicated in this analysis suggest that under the 294, 296 and 298 crest elevations the smallmouth bass habitat suitability for spawning and adults would increase with increasing dam height, and changes in juvenile habitat would be marginally decreased .
The basic reasons for the model predictions are that the species criteria curves indicated that optimal adult smallmouth bass depth is between four and seventeen feet, and for spawning the optimal velocity is between 0.5 and 1.0 feet per second.
The amount of habitat meeting these criteria increases with the increases in dam crest elevations.
The IFIM results for American shad, channel catfish and gizzard shad likewise suggest that increasing the crest elevation would produce minor increases in habitat for these species, although channel catfish spawning habitat would decrease slightly.
Taken in the aggregate, the results of the IFIM analyses suggest that there would be little positive or negative changes in the habitat or fish populations.
The PFBC's concerns regarding the smallmouth bass population appear to relate to a belief that there would be an increase in the accumulation of sediment and gravel in the impounded areas.
The City is firmly convinced that there would be no accumulation of these materials.
The Dock Street Dam has existed for 93 years and field studies have demonstrated that there is no buildup of sediment in the existing impounded areas.
It is also important to recognize that the alternatives examined involving dam replacement with increases in the crest elevation assumed that the new structures will be inflatable dams.
These structures are normally deflated from November through May 15, a period that historically experiences high river flows.
It is expected that during high flows with the dam deflated that natural movement of sediment and bed load would occur, preventing any accumulation.
Because of this ability, the replacement of the existing fixed crest dam with an inflatable structure would represent a benefit by allowing the free movement of bed load and sediment through the project area.
In summary, although the City acknowledges concerns about the resource, the City believes that there is a credible scientific basis to support its position that the fishery in the project area will not be adversely affected.
Note: The City believes that the majority of factors indicate a minor (2-4 feet) increase in the dam height will not adversely affect smallmouth bass.
The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, however, disagrees with the assessment of increased adult smallmouth bass habitat with a higher dam because the assessment assumed that the river bottom in the newly impounded
30
area would continue to have high quality adult smallmouth bass cover.
The PFBC believes that the electrofishing studies of smallmouth bass conducted on behalf of the City do not constitute a fair or representative sample of impoundment habitats but rather were samples collected in relatively shallow water near the shorelines of the river bank and islands.
Further, the habitat suitability indices for smallmouth bass spawning under turbid water conditions is much more shallow than the City has acknowledged.
PFBC believes the bottom cover could be further degraded by the accumulation of gravel and sediment and that the abundance of adult smallmouth bass will decrease somewhat.
The Cities assumption of flushing of sediment and gravel with bags deflated during high river flows has not been demonstrated and is highly dependent on the sill height of the proposed dam and the manner in which the dam is operated.
During the project development and permitting phase that should include establishing the sill height and mode of operation, it is suggested that the potential for changes in substrate conditions should be examined and any attendant impacts to the smallmouth bass and other resident fish populations should be determined.
III H. Birds The section of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg is a significant resource area for breeding and migratory birds.
A systematic study, including identification and counts of birds at seven stations on the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg, was conducted in 1986 by Acres International.
Study results included counts of 10,573 birds in a total of 91 avian species of which 5471 individuals in 41 species were water species.
Their observations from the Fish and Boat Commission West Fairview boat access indicated that it is an important birding site.
A total of 3808 water birds (70% of the all observed birds) in 29 species were identified at this site.
Canada goose was the most common species.
The numbers of Mallard, Bufflehead and Ringbilled Gull was higher at this site than any of the other six observation sites.
Water bird species observed only at this site included Mute Swan, Tundra Swan, Pintail, Blue-winged Teal, Rednecked Grebe and Horned Grebe.
The islands of the Susquehanna River in Harrisburg support significant populations of birds.
Part of this area, known as the Sheets Island Archipelago, was identified as an "Important Bird Area" by the Pennsylvania Audubon Society on the basis of wintering and migratory birds, and, especially, the Great Egret and Black-crowned Night Heron colony at Wade Island (Table III D 1).
This is Pennsylvania's largest rookery, and is the only regular nesting site in the state for the Great Egret.
Table III D1.
Annual nests counts of bird species on Wade Island, courtesy of Cal Butchkoski, Wildlife Diversity Section, Pennsylvania Game Commission.
DATE 4/30/85 5/18/87 5/6/88 5/2/89 4/30/90 4/29/91 Great Egret 30 48 74 78 92 81
Blackcrowned night-heron 150 190 180 268 345 275
Yellowcrowned night-heron 0 0 0 0 0 0
Great blue heron 5 0 0 0 0 0
Double crested Cormorant 0 0 0 0 0 0
31
DATE 4/28/92 4/27/94 4/27/95 5/7/96 4/23/97 4/16/98 4/26/99 5/4/00
Great Egret 161 133 136 155 131 144 159 148
Blackcrowned night-heron 252 238 230 200 99 181 120 134
Yellowcrowned night-heron 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
Great blue heron 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
Double crested Cormorant 0 0 0 1 1 2 4 9
The Great Egret is listed as "Endangered" in Pennsylvania.
The state's entire nesting population, 159 active nests, was found at the Wade Island colony.
This count, made in 1999, is very close to the all-time high of 161 nests at this site in 1992.
However, erosion on the eastern side of the island suggests a need for proactive management to assure that the nest site is not further degraded or lost.
The Yellow-crowned Night-Heron, also an "Endangered" species in Pennsylvania, has isolated nests on only a few creeks in the south central portion of Pennsylvania.
In the project area, this species nests on the island closest the Governor's Mansion, and along the lower Conodoguinet Creek at a site less than half a mile from its confluence with the Susquehanna.
The Black-crowned Night-Heron population, a "Candidate-at-Risk Species", at Wade Island dropped by one-third again in 1999 to a count of 120 nests, after recouping in 1998 some of the earlier declines.
Black-crowns remain well below the five-year (1992-1997) average of 230 active nests.
There are only five regular nesting colonies of this species in Pennsylvania.
The population of Black-crowned Night-Heron in Pennsylvania has declined precipitously during the past decade.
Much of that is attributed to the decline of the state's largest known colony, Wade Island, but other sites have experienced declining numbers as well or have been abandoned.
Because of the sharp decline in the number of known nests statewide and the abandonment of several colonies, the Ornithological Technical Committee (OTC) voted unanimously in March, 2000 to recommend that the Pennsylvania Game Commission list the black-crowned night-heron as threatened.
Shallow waters of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg are important feeding areas for wading birds.
Acres International, in March 2000, provided an assessment of the impact of habitat changes on the Susquehanna River birds.
The report indicated that during 1987 studies, "black crowned night heron and great egret feed in large numbers at the islands around Sheets Island.
The Acres Report suggested losses in Scrub/Shrub Wetlands, Forested Wetland and Forested Uplands would adversely affect the habitat available for various birds species; however, the reports assertion of an increase in emergent wetlands is strongly disputed by the wetland impact assessment reviewed in the next section of this report.
Loss of emergent wetlands will mean loss of habitat for great egret and similar wading birds.
Waterfowl and shorebirds frequent this area of the Susquehanna River.
Waterfowl utilize the project area in the early spring during migration.
The area below the Conodoguinet Creek is popular for waterfowl, probably because of the proliferation of aquatic plants in this section of the river influenced by the productive influence of the Conodoguinet's water chemistry.
32
Shorebirds migrate through this area in both the spring and autumn, but linger to feed for their long migration during the late summer.
Shorebirds are known to use the extreme shallow island and river edges and mudflats.
There are three ways that increased dam height affect bird species.
These impacts are important during the breeding season.
1.
Human disturbance reduces the success of wading bird populations.
These species begin nest-building in April, lay eggs in late April or early May and rear young through late July.
Juvenile birds learn to feed in shallows through the remainder of the summer.
Wading birds, like many species of wildlife, are most successful when disturbance is limited.
Human activities have the potential to disturb wading birds in the project area; for instance, feeding birds wade in shallow water and are flushed when boats approach too closely and birds are flushed from nests and perches on Wade Island by noisy or close boat traffic.
When birds are absent from nests, predation of eggs or young can occur.
Wildlife Conservation officers thought Jet-ski activity to be a factor in the May 1988 abandonment of the multi-species rookery on "Rookery Island" near Washington Boro on the lower Susquehanna River.
Boating and wading exclusion zones around sensitive areas have the potential to reduce human disturbance impacts.
2.
Loss of shallow water directly reduces the available feeding area.
Wading birds prey on fish and crustaceans in shallow water.
Their leg lengths are adapted to hunting in shallow water.
A factor in Wade Island's success as Pennsylvania's most important wading bird colony is the close availability of shallow water habitat rich with crayfish, insects and small fish.
Even minor increases in water depth may exceed the birds leg length and eliminate feeding areas.
3.
At a dam height of 298' amsl, there would be a water level increase at Wade Island with unknown impacts on the rookery.
Shorebirds of the Sheet's Island Archipelago With reference to the Dock Street Dam Migratory shorebirds include about 30 species that pass through Pennsylvania during the latespring and mid-summer, en route to nesting areas primarily in Arctic Canada.
Most of these species forage in shallow water (less than 3 inches depth) and exposed areas of mud, sand, gravel and cobble.
They generally avoid vegetated areas, although several species (American woodcock and common snipe) frequent dense cover.
These species are hotly pursued by the birding community because of the identification challenge they present and their rarity in the state.
The habitat of these birds is typically ephemeral, widely-scattered in small patches.
Many species are common across their range and abundant in neighboring coastal states during peak migration.
As a group, shorebirds are of concern because of the specialized wetland habitat which they occupy and the concentrations of birds found during migration.
Shorebirds are annually found in the Sheets Island Archipelago area (section of Susquehanna River upstream of the Dock Street Dam) primarily during low-water levels of late summer.
Dry summers result in extensive exposed river bottom and shallow water areas in this region, particularly around the boat access points at West Fairview and Wormleysburg.
These access points have enabled birders to document shorebirds activity from shore, although extensive habitat is likely inaccessible to the general public without a boat.
For this reason, shorebird `counts' and even species lists probably underestimate the shorebird use of this area.
The Sheets Island region is not among a short list of Pennsylvania's shorebirds concentrate points (National
33
Shorebird Conservation Plan).
Never the less, at least 10 species of shorebirds are known to regularly occupy the river islands and exposed flats along this stretch of the Susquehanna River, and there is considerable interest among the birding community in seeing these species during late-summer.
Only the spotted sandpiper and killdeer breed in the area, on exposed areas of the river islands.
The most obvious and regularly occurring migratory species include the greater and lesser yellowlegs, as well as the semipalmated, solitary, and least sandpipers.
None of the shorebirds regularly found within this area are considered Species of Special Concern; but, many rare birds have been observed in this area (Table III D 2).
While these species occur here, it is probably the case that none of these birds strictly depend on this area for their survival, since habitat is variable year-to-year and even within years.
Table III D 2.
Shorebird species seen in the "Sheets Island Archipelago" region of Susquehanna River, Dauphin Co.
Nesting species are asterisked (*) and the most common species are listed in bold.
Semipalmated Plover Killdeer* Ruddy Turnstone Greater Yellowlegs Lesser Yellowlegs Solitary Sandpiper Willet Spotted Sandpiper* Sanderling Semipalmated Sandpiper Least Sandpiper White-rumped Sandpiper Pectoral Sandpiper Dunlin Stilt Sandpiper Short-billed Dowitcher Common Snipe American Woodcock Shorebird populations would undoubtedly respond to any changes to the Dock Street Dam that would periodically or permanently raise water levels.
A tremendous area of shallow-water habitat occurs each year in response to lower river flow levels typical during the summer.
That condition is particularly prominent along the shelf-rock and scattered islands at West Fairview.
Establishing a higher base water level during the late-summer (prime boating season) would eliminate, at least temporarily, shorebird habitat under most submerged areas.
Different access to this area by the public may result in a different perception of shorebird numbers.
Monitoring of shorebird (as well as wading bird) activity, such as has been done at the Safe Harbor Dam in response to proposed raising water-levels by the Safe Harbor Water Power Company, would be highly recommended.
Standardized base-line shorebird numbers could be determined over a 3-year period prior to any changes in dam level.
34
Increases in water level with attendant changes in hydrology and increased recreational activity around the islands as a result of the proposal to raise the level of the Dock Street Dam present considerable risks to the bird life described above.
III I. Wetlands Wetlands are among the most productive ecosystems in the world (U.S. EPA, 1993).
More than 50 percent of the 800 protected migratory breeding birds and 80 percent of the breeding bird population in the United States rely on wetlands (Warton et al., 1982).
More than one third of the nation's endangered species lives in or uses wetlands (U.S. DOI et al., 1999).
At present, Pennsylvania has about 320,000 acres of vegetated wetlands, representing less than 1.5% of the state's landmass.
Between 1956 and 1979, Pennsylvania lost nearly 28,000 acres of vegetated wetlands, a 6% loss (Tiner, 1987).
Overall, Pennsylvania has lost 56% of its wetlands between the 1780s and the mid-1980s (Dahl, 1990).
The area under consideration for the maximum dam height of 298' amsl extends from the existing Dock Street Dam to approximately 2000 feet upriver of the I-81 bridge and includes the lower 3000 feet of Conodoguinet Creek.
The Susquehanna River reach is represented by an extensive and diverse array of wetland resources.
The Acres International Corporation (Acres) March, 2000 report estimated that the study area contained approximately 127 acres of perennial aquatic vegetation (a category which includes emergent vegetated wetlands, submerged aquatic vegetation, unconsolidated shorelines, sandbars, and gravel bars in areas less than 6-feet deep), 66 acres of scrub-shrub wetlands, and 59 acres of forested wetlands.
Taken together these comprise a total of 252 acres of wetland resource.
The overall wetland resources can best be characterized as a River Bed-Bank-Floodplain Complex as described in Terrestrial and Palustrine Plant Communities of Pennsylvania by Jean Fike, Pennsylvania Natural Diversity Inventory, June, 1999.
The wetlands are classified as Riverine System and Palustrine System under the Classification of Wetlands and Deepwater Habitat of the United States (U.S. DOI, 1979).
The majority of the forested and scrub-shrub wetland resources within the study area are associated with the island complex, with the emergent wetlands distributed in shallow water areas throughout the main river channel.
Water willow, (Justicia americana), is the dominant vascular plant in the emergent wetlands within the Susquehanna River.
Of the 127 acres of Perennial Aquatic Vegetation identified in a March 1994 Acres report, approximately 100 acres (78%) are comprised of water willow.
Stands of water willow are present in shallow water areas to a depth of 0-2 feet of water, with preferred rooting depth within 1 foot or less of water; the conditions were confirmed during a July, 2000 field review in the proposed impact areas.
According to Koryak (1978) and Reilley (1984), these vascular plants indicate generally good water quality conditions.
Water willow is highly productive in contributing significant amounts of detritus to the food chain of the river ecosystem and provides important habitat for aquatic macroinvertebrates and fish.
Water willow can tolerate total inundation for about one month in duration during the growing season (Koryak, 1978).
Wetlands, and the maintenance of riparian buffers, are important to the health and protection of the Susquehanna River and the Chesapeake Bay.
The Susquehanna River, and associated wetland complex present in the study area, provides many natural environmental functions and societal values considered important to the public interest.
The "Functions" referred to are selfsustaining properties of a wetland ecosystem that exist in the absence of society.
The "Values" are benefits that derive from either one or more functions and the physical characteristics
35
associated with a wetland.
In the best professional judgement of the wetlands experts and regulators represented on the Working Group, the aquatic resources in the study area are providing the following functions and values: 1.
Fish habitat for both resident warm water species and migratory fish species, thereby contributing to restoration efforts of the 1987 Chesapeake Bay Agreement.
2.
Sediment, toxicant, and pathogen retention.
3.
Nutrient removal, retention, and transformation.
4.
Food chain production export.
5.
Shoreline and sediment stabilization.
6.
Wildlife habitat for mammals, reptiles, amphibians, and birds (including restricted bird nesting areas, and an area designated by the national Audubon Society as a Pennsylvania Important Bird Area).
7.
Habitat for State and Federal threatened and endangered species (Bald Eagle, Peregrine Falcon, Osprey, Great Egret, and Yellow Crowned Night Heron).
8.
Uniqueness and heritage values, including the Sheets Island Archipelago Natural Area (Designated by the Pennsylvania Department of Conservation and Natural Resources), and the presence of prehistoric archaeological artifacts.
9.
Recreational values such as a nationally recognized small mouth bass fishery, a segment of the Susquehanna River Trail officially designated in 1998, power boating, canoeing, waterfowl hunting, and wildlife viewing.
10.
Educational and scientific values.
11.
Aesthetic values.
The Susquehanna River and associated wetland complex within the study area, when viewed in the overall context of the functions and values they provide, are reflective of aquatic resources of national importance due to their high quality and significance.
Wetland impacts were assessed for the seven alternatives under consideration utilizing the Acres 1991 Vegetative Cover Map.
This baseline resources map was selected as providing a more accurate representation of existing wetland resources than depicted in the Acres March 2000 Vegetative Cover Map when compared to aerial photographs of the study area (March 1984, August 1986, September 1987, May 1990).
Impacts to wetland resources were assessed for the typical growing season conditions during the months of July through October for normal summer low flow discharges averaging from 5,000 CFS (gauge height at Harrisburg 3.5') to 10,000 CFS (gauge height at Harrisburg 4.0').
For dam height alternatives exceeding the existing dam crest height of 292 AMSL (292.7' water level @1,700 CFS, 293.5' water level @10,000 CFS), wetland impacts due to increased pool level elevations were obtained utilizing a Tamaya Planix 5000 planimeter.
For this assessment, wetland impacts were considered as permanent where water levels would increase a minimum of 1 foot, representing the mid-point between the 0' to 2' water level increase gradation towards the head of each pool for the three increased dam height alternatives.
Sufficient information is not currently available at this time to accurately estimate potential adverse wetland impacts within the increased water level gradation between 0' to 1'.
The wetland assessment was undertaken with the following considerations: 1.
The Acres 1991 Vegetative Cover Map depicts in several areas a "conglomeration" of Perennial Aquatic Vegetation for the ease of labeling and identification for this resource category.
When compared to the aerial photographs, we determined that they did not accurately represent the total area of emergent wetlands that would be adversely affected if
36
the entire conglomeration were measured by planimeter.
Therefore, we planimetered each emergent wetland within a given conglomeration to determine the total area that would be adversely affected.
2.
We considered all wetlands flooded by 1-foot deep or greater to be adversely affected for each of the three higher dam height alternatives (within the 0' to 2' gradation at the head of each pool).
It is our opinion that a 1-foot minimum change in water levels would alter wetland hydrology so that a community shift or other adverse impact would occur.
For example, the rooting depth range for water willow is between 0 to 2 feet, with a preferred rooting depth of 1 foot or less.
For areas that would experience a minimum water level increase of 1-foot, much of the water willow growing at or near the 1-foot depth preferred range would be shifted to the maximum depth or potentially exceeding the maximum depth, resulting in stress or elimination.
For similar reasons, we may suspect additional emergent wetland losses for areas that are flooded below 1-foot, particularly for water willow growing at or near its maximum rooting depth.
However, since adverse impacts within this range (0' to 1' increase) cannot be determined with any certainty at this time, these areas were not included in our assessment.
3.
The November 1993 and March 2000 Acres reports include, under their code for Perennial Aquatic Vegetation several different resource types, including: Submerged vegetation beds Unconsolidated shorelines Sandbars Gravel bars
Under this classification of aquatic resources, there were 4 acres (0.03%) of submerged vegetation (SAV) with a water depth range of 0' to 4', 100 acres (78%) of "emergent" species with a water depth range of 0' to 2', and 23 acres (19%) within the remaining resource types.
Acres additionally assumed that aquatic vegetation beds would develop in up to 6 feet of water.
For the wetland impact assessment section of this report, it was important to differentiate those areas meeting the definition of emergent/herbaceous wetlands as contained in the 1987 Corps of Engineers Wetlands Delineation Manual, the current Congressionally approved methodology for wetland identification and delineation.
This definition, for emergent wetland plants, states: "A rooted herbaceous plant species that has parts extending above a water surface."
For areas labeled with Perennial Aquatic Vegetation code on the 1991 Vegetative Cover Map, only those areas that could best be identified as emergent/herbaceous wetlands when compared to aerial photographs were planimetered.
4.
Due to the large size of McCormicks Island and the elevation of the interior portions of the island, it is unlikely that the hydrology maintaining this wetland occurs during summer low flow discharges.
The hydrology influencing and maintaining this forested wetland system is more likely the result of poor drainage within depressions in the interior of the island.
Therefore, due to the elevation of the forested wetlands within the interior of the island, no adverse impacts are expected, even at the highest increased dam alternative of 298' amsl.
Wetland Impacts of Alernatives: a.
No Action: This alternative would not affect existing wetland resources positively or negatively.
Baseline conditions would remain presuming the dam does not deteriorate and fail.
We consider this alternative to result in no effect on wetlands.
37
b. Remove Dam: This alternative would result in an increase in wetland resources within the existing pool level of the Dock Street Dam.
Lower water levels would increase shallow water areas favoring the establishment of water willow beds, primarily from approximately 2,000 feet above the Harvey Taylor Bridge downstream to the existing dam.
The amount of shallow water areas exposed would likely be greater than, and offset, the amount of existing emergent wetlands that would be lost around the fringe of City Island and behind bridge piers.
Presently, the hydrology maintaining these emergent wetland systems is a result of the existing pool level created by the dam.
No significant change in the community types within the scrub-shrub wetland and upland forested islands upstream of the Harvey Taylor bridge would be expected, as this area represents the furthest upstream extent of the existing pool level, and removal of the dam should decrease water levels 1-foot or less in this concentrated island area.
This alternative would be considered positive for wetland resources.
c. Repair dam at existing 292' elevation (concrete): This alternative would not affect wetland resources positively or negatively.
Existing wetland resources would be retained; thus we would consider this alternative to result in no effect on wetlands. d. Replace dam at existing 292' elevation (inflatable rubber dam): Effect determination would be considered the same as #3.
e. Replace with inflatable dam at increased crest heights of 294', 296', and 298' AMSL: The following wetland impacts would occur at the 3 increased dam height alternatives: Dam height 294' to point of 1' minimum water level increase: 1.90 acres forested 22.88 acres scrub-shrub 30.27 acres emergent ____________________ 55.05 acres total Dam height 296' to point of 1' minimum water level increase: 8.93 acres forested 31.72 acres scrub-shrub 55.74 acres emergent ____________________ 96.39 acres total Dam height 298' to point of 1' minimum water level increase: 10.38 acres forested 53.18 acres scrub-shrub 85.01 acres emergent ____________________ 148.57 acres total The cumulative amount of wetland loss for each of the increased dam height alternatives would be considered significant and require the preparation of an Environmental Impact Statement in
38
compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended (NEPA).
All three increased dam height alternatives would negatively affect wetland resources.
The primary factor resulting in the loss of wetlands would be inundation from increased pool depths during the typical growing season conditions at normal summer low flow discharges.
The Acres March 2000 report attempts to predict changes in wetland and upland acreage at alternative reservoir levels, in response to a shift in both wetland and upland community types.
This type of "trade-off analysis" must be viewed with caution.
The Acres report predicts a net loss for scrub-shrub and forested wetlands for each of the three increased dam height alternatives; however, an overall net increase is predicted for aquatic resources under the category of Aquatic Vegetation Beds.
The increases are predicted at +14 acres at 292', +29 acres at 296', and +52 acres at 298'.
As stated earlier in this section, the resource category of Aquatic Vegetation Beds includes several different types of aquatic resources.
At issue here is whether any of the increased dam height alternatives would actually create conditions suitable to increase the emergent wetlands acreage in the study area.
An assumption was made by Acres that the depth range for which Aquatic Vegetation Beds would develop includes all areas inundated up to 6-feet deep.
Under this assumption, not all of the total acreage predicted under the net gain of Aquatic Vegetation Beds will be conducive to emergent wetland establishment if over two feet in depth.
Any of the increased dam height alternatives would effectively decrease the amount of shallow water areas conducive to emergent wetland establishment, with the exception of the island fringes where a community change would occur.
However, under the increased dam height alternatives, the total area of the "wetted perimeter" of each island would decrease.
Even if a shift in community type to emergent wetlands around the perimeter of the islands does occur, an overall net loss would result from the inundation of the numerous emergent wetland beds within the river channel.
Therefore, the Acres assumption of an overall net increase in Aquatic Vegetation Beds could only be accurate when considering all of the aquatic resource types that they have included under this category (especially, unconsolidated shorelines, sandbars, and gravel bars up to 6 feet in water depth).
However, a net decrease in emergent wetlands would result.
Additionally, we note that within the study area SAV is relatively scarce (4 acres total), except in the vicinity of the mouth of Conodoguinet Creek where there is organic enrichment and adequate amounts of preferred substrate (silts) are deposited.
Under any of the increased dam height alternatives, which would incorporate a seasonally operated inflatable dam, there will be periods during the year when the dam is deflated as a seasonal restriction to facilitate the passage of migratory fish.
This period, in the spring months, will coincide with normal high discharge events, which will effectively mobilize sediments (particularly silts) through the project reach on an annual basis.
Under this dam operations scenario, none of the increased dam height alternatives will result in the deposition of silts favored by SAV due to seasonal flushing.
Therefore, we do not expect that the distribution or overall amount of SAV will increase as a result of any of the increased dam height alternatives.
What will remain then, under the Acres assumption of a net gain of Aquatic Vegetation Beds will be a predominance of unconsolidated shorelines, sandbars, and gravel bars, with the potential for some emergent wetland establishment as a shift in community types around the perimeter of the lower relief islands.
At this time, it is difficult to predict the nature and extent of community shifts within the island complex that may result from any of the increased dam height alternatives, either from one
39
wetland type to another, or from upland to wetland.
Our assessment primarily centered on the foreseeable impacts that would result from flooding at increased pool depths.
With the exception of the forested wetlands on the interior of McCormicks Island, the hydrology of the remaining wetlands in the study area is directly influenced by river water levels, again at the typical growing season conditions for normal summer low flow discharges.
Any increases in water depth 1-foot or more given this baseline hydrologic regime (i.e., what are now considered the "normal circumstances") will adversely affect the wetland types that currently exist.
Our assessment did not attempt to incorporate a "trade-off analysis" for shifts in wetland types given the large uncertainty of what may actually occur within these island systems at various water level increases.
The only available data depicting elevations within the island systems in the study area is from the Harrisburg West U.S.G.S quadrangle which shows a contour elevation maximum of 300' AMSL for several of the islands.
We note that for areas shown as 300' AMSL on the quad sheet, these areas correspond very well to upland areas as depicted on the Acres 1991 Vegetative Cover Map.
To accurately assess the nature and degree of community shifts, detailed elevations (1-foot contours) would be needed for each island.
In addition, the elevations for specific wetland types at each island relative to the normal summer low flow conditions would be required, as the elevation at which they currently exist, or will potentially establish, will vary along the river continuum.
For example, the elevations of the upland portions of islands upriver of the project area gradually increase to 320' on Berrier Island to 360' on Clemson Island.
Similarly, the elevations of existing wetlands, or where they may potentially become established on different islands, will also increase as you proceed upriver.
Due to the varying nature of where the wetlands may establish (i.e., shift) for increased water levels at different increased dam height alternatives, at conducive elevations at different island, this determination cannot be made without specific and detailed information.
The only assessment that can be made concerning community shifts within the project area for increased dam height alternatives are these: 1.
The total area of islands, whether upland or wetland, will decrease.
2.
The overall diversity of these island systems, many containing a mix of community types (emergent wetland, scrub-shrub wetland, and flood plain forested wetlands and uplands), will decrease.
Any increased dam height alternative would require an assessment of potential cumulative impacts under NEPA.
The cumulative impacts assessment would require consideration of the cumulative adverse environmental effects of the proposed increased dam height alternatives in relationship to other existing dams on the Susquehanna River, as well as the effects of the wetland losses and all other aquatic and terrestrial environmental factors.
IV.
Summary of Alternatives' Analysis The Working Groups' charge was identifying possible alternatives that might be considered for the future of Dock Street Dam.
The seven alternatives below included no action, removing the dam, repair or replace the dam at the same height, replacing the dam with one of three higher inflatable dams.
A major focus of the Working Group was the analysis of effects of the alternatives on important attributes of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg including boating, an array of environmental conditions, costs of construction, economic impacts, safety
40
considerations, regulatory issues, and nuisances.
A summary of the probable impacts of implementing each of the seven alternatives is discussed.
IV A.
No Action Environmental Impacts: Water quality: It is expected that water quality would be unchanged if no action occurs.
Birds: The status of the bird life on the river near Harrisburg is not expected to change if no action occurs.
Fish: The fish community in the river near Harrisburg would not be expected to change if no action occurs.
Wetlands: The no action alternate would not adversely affect wetland resources.
Existing wetland resources would be retained.
Note: Continued deterioration of the dam which would tend toward the "no-dam" conditions that are generally regarded as improvements for environmental components of the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg, with the notable exception of exposing the combined sewerage/stormwater overflows.
Fish Passage: There would be minimal change in fish passage; however, if additional breaches occur in the future, fish passage would improve.
Recreation: Fishing and boating activities would not be changed by taking no action; however, continued deterioration of the dam would, eventually, result in the inability to maintain the pool level under low flows and certain power boat activities would decrease.
Safety: Safety would not improve and continued deterioration of the dam would be viewed as an increasing safety hazard.
The Department of Environmental Protection, Division of Dam Safety, however, does have regulatory requirements with regard to maintenance of the dam and these might be exercised if continued deterioration of the dam were posing a significant threat to public safety.
No action could result in increased liability issues for the City.
Ease of Regulatory Process: There would be no regulatory requirements with regard to construction, encroachment, water quality or environmental impacts.
Nuisance Impacts:
41
Continued deterioration of the dam.
Eventual exposure of the combined sewerage and stormwater overflows.
Costs: Minimal Economic Impacts: Not Evaluated.
IV B. Remove Dam Environmental Impacts Water quality: The characteristics of dissolved oxygen, solids/sediment, turbidity and temperature would be optimum in a free flowing river that would result from the removal of the dam.
If not properly relocated, potential decreased water quality and, possibly, aesthetic problems could result from exposing combined sewerage/storm water overflows.
Wetlands: With this alternative, there is a high likelihood of a net increase in wetland resources within the presently impounded area of the Dock Street Dam.
The net increase in the various types of wetlands or wetland community size will be dependent on various conditions including water depth, velocity, and substrate.
Lower water levels would increase shallow water areas favoring the establishment of water willow beds, primarily in near shore areas from approximately 2,000 feet upriver of the Harvey Taylor Bridge downstream to the existing dam.
The amount of shallow water areas exposed would likely be greater than, and offset, the amount of existing emergent wetlands that would be lost around the fringe of City Island and behind bridge piers.
Presently, the hydrology maintaining these emergent wetland systems is a result of the existing pool level created by the dam.
No significant change would be expected in the community types within the scrub-shrub wetland and upland forested islands upstream of the Harvey Taylor bridge.
This area represents the furthest upstream extent of the existing pool level, and removal of the dam should decrease water levels one foot or less in this concentrated island area.
This alternative would be considered positive for increasing wetland resources.
Birds: Removal of the dam would be favorable for birds.
There should be significant increases in emergent aquatic vegetation and banks utilized by wading birds, shorebirds and waterfowl.
Reduced boating activity should reduce interference with or harassment of the birds.
Fish: With the dam removed, the fish species in the area of the river influenced by the impoundment would shift to a community adapted to riffle/run type habitat.
There should be higher levels of smallmouth bass spawning and nursery and possibly higher densities of adult smallmouth bass in the area now impounded by the dam.
42
Fish Passage: Removing the dam and returning the river to its free flowing condition would be the best possible condition for fish passage.
Migratory and resident fish could move unimpeded upstream past Harrisburg.
Recreation Boating on the river with the dam removed would change radically.
It is unlikely that the free flowing river would be suitable for pontoon boats.
The Pride of the Susquehanna could not operate.
The marinas as currently constructed would not be functional.
The anchorage created off the west shore would not be usable nor would the docks on the west shore be usable.
The number of watercraft that could use the river near Harrisburg would be limited by the number and quality of the access areas.
Power boats designed for river running operation would have access to the river from downstream areas; however, the Fish and Boat Commission's West Fairview boat access would have even less utility than it has now with more extensive shallows for longer distances.
Fishing boats, canoes and other non-power watercraft would dominate the boating scene.
Fishing would change significantly with removal of the dam.
The concentration of angling activity both on banks and in boats in the tail-water downstream of the dam would decrease without the dam.
Wade fishing would increase in shallow areas that were previously impounded.
The circumstance of boat fishing in the pool is uncertain since there will be a loss of boat mooring and marina capacity.
However, higher levels of boat fishing could result on the free flowing river, if there is adequate boat access and the habitat supported higher densities of bass.
Safety If the Dock Street Dam were removed, safety and liability issues associated with the physical dam would be eliminated.
There would no longer be a deteriorating dam in danger of collapsing, there would no longer be a dangerous hydraulic backwash; in addition, the pool and physical site of the dam would be removed.
Ease of Regulatory Process The Department of Environmental Protection, through a permit waiver, can authorize breaching and removing the dam as a stream restoration project.
The waiver requires review and approval of a breach plan and Environmental Assessment approval for a Water Quality Certification approval.
The Corps of Engineers would require an Individual Permit for the removal alternative including preparation of an Environmental Assessment.
Removal would likely require a public hearing.
Nuisance Impacts Exposure of the combined sewerage and storm-water overflows.
Cost $300,000
43
Economic Impacts Not Evaluated.
IV C. Repair at Same 292' Height Environmental Impacts Water quality: It is expected that water quality would be unchanged if the dam were repaired.
Birds: The status of the bird life on the river near Harrisburg is not expected to change due to repair to the existing dam.
Fish: The fish community in the river near Harrisburg would not be expected to change if the existing dam were to be repaired.
Wetlands: This alternative would not affect wetland resources positively or negatively.
Existing wetland resources would be retained; thus, we would consider this alternative to result in no effect on wetlands.
Fish Passage: The breaches and leakage of Dock Street Dam in its existing condition likely enhance fish passage to some degree by providing additional passageways for fish and by lowering the depth of the pool under low flow conditions.
Repairing or replacing the existing dam to eliminate breaches and stopping leakage would be expected to reduce fish passage somewhat at lower flows; but probably not greatly at higher flows.
If the existing dam were to be repaired, the Fish and Boat Commission would seek to have fish passage installed at the existing Dock Street Dam such as more notches, wider notches, open weirs or controlled weirs.
Recreation Boating and fishing would probably be sustained at current levels if the dam were repaired; however, providing more parking, launching and marina space might be expected to increase the boating use of the existing pool.
Safety If the Dock Street Dam were repaired as it was in the1960's, general site liability would still be an issue, as would the dangerous hydraulic backwash.
A repair would merely extend the life of the existing dam, and would not resolve the existing safety issues.
The only safety issue that would be mitigated would be the structural safety of the dam itself and its ability to perform with an adequate margin of safety.
Ease of Regulatory Process Repairing the existing dam at the same height will require review and approval of repair plans by the Department of Environmental Protection and would be approved with a
44
letter of authorization.
The Corps of Engineers would require an Individual Permit for the repairs including preparation of an Environmental Assessment.
The Environmental Assessment is also required to obtain a Water Quality Certification approval.
Nuisance Impacts There would be no change in nuisance situations by repairing the existing dam.
Cost A detailed engineering assessment of the condition of the dam structure would be necessary for a reasonable cost estimate to be determined.
Economic Impacts Repairing the existing dam would avoid the eventual difficulties, expense, and possible litigation that would come as the dam continues to deteriorate on its own.
While the risk of catastrophic collapse seems minimal, a section could fail and injure or kill someone.
Increased fishing from the successful restoration of American shad is expected to be a significant net economic gain.
The river near Harrisburg could become a focal point for shad fishing.
Repairing the dam at the same height would be a significant expense without realizing any economic net gain.
A detailed comparison of costs, features, and benefits would have to be done to analyze the economic impacts.
IV D. Replace at Same 292' Height with Inflatable Dam Environmental Impacts Water quality, birds, fish and wetland impacts would be the same as with repair at the current elevation.
Fish Passage: Replacing Dock Street Dam with an inflatable dam at the same 292' MSL offers the potential to improve fish passage.
First, operating the dam with bags down from April 1 through June 30 would be essentially as good as a free flowing river for passing migratory fish.
Second, if the bags were raised prior to the end of the migratory fish passage period, notches would be needed to simulate the present level of passage or, third, innovative fish passage designs would be needed to improve migratory fish passage over present conditions.
Recreation As with repair of the dam at elevation 292' msl,, if the dam were replaced at the same height, boating and fishing would probably be sustained at current levels; however, providing more parking, launching and marina space could increase the boating use of the existing pool.
45
Safety A dam replacement at elevation 292 msl would mitigate the structure safety issue and give the City the opportunity to mitigate the dangerous hydraulic conditions associated with the existing dam.
The design of a new inflatable dam could incorporate the results of theoretical and physical hydraulic modeling that would reduce or eliminate any hydraulic backwash effect at normal flows.
Also, in late winter and early spring when most dam tragedies occur, the dam could actually be deflated.
Ease of Regulatory Process Replacement of the dam at the same height will require a Dam Safety Permit from the Commonwealth in addition to the approvals listed under the repair alternative previously described.
In general, removal and repair or replacement of the dam with no increase in normal pool elevation requires a less rigorous review and approval process.
Federal approval would be provided with a Pennsylvania State Programmatic General Permit-1 (PASPGP_1) or an Individual Permit.
An Environmental Assessment approval would be required.
Nuisance Impacts Not evaluated Cost (See Appendix D for cost breakdown) Dam Cost Infrastructure mitigation Total project cost Economic Impacts: Not evaluated $9,413,000 0 $9,413,000
IV E 1.
Replace with Inflatable Dam at elevation 294' Environmental Impacts Water quality would probably undergo some minor degradation from decreased dissolved oxygen, increased temperature and turbidity and some minor sediment deposition.
Fish: The proposed operation of the inflatable dam would restore some of the dynamics of the Susquehanna River.
The ultimate effect of this dynamic in restoring the degraded substrate in the impounded area is unknown.
During the summer reproductive period for the warmwater fishes which inhabit the Susquehanna River, however, the dam would be inflated and the pool fully formed; this situation would favor fish species that prefer
46
shallow lake conditions.
Smallmouth bass and channel catfish spawning and nursery habitat would be reduced to some degree.
Wetlands: A total of 55.06 acres of wetlands would be impacted upriver to the point with a minimum one foot increase in water level elevation.
These impacts include: 1.90 acres forested 22.88 acres scrub-shrub 30.27 acres emergent Birds: There would be an adverse impact on birds.
More than 20% of all the wetlands would be impacted which would diminish the availability of feeding and lounging areas.
Island scrub-shrub habitat and shoreline lengths would decrease and reduce the areas for shore and bank birds.
Increased boat access to sensitive bird feeding areas would result in greater harassment.
Fish Passage: Replacing Dock Street Dam with a 294' msl inflatable dam will make improving fish passage a challenge.
If a 294' msl inflatable dam is not operated with bags down to simulate a free flowing river through the April 1 to June 30 spring fish migration period, more expensive innovative fish passageway designs will be required to improve fish passage over existing conditions at the Dock Street Dam.
It is unlikely that simple notches would be adequate over the full range of river flow conditions; and it is expected that fish passage facilities would be required.
Recreation Boating: At dam height of 294' msl, the usable boating pool is expected to increase by about 200 acres.
The larger pool could be expected to favor more powerful boats; which, theoretically, require more surface area per boat.
Even with an estimated doubling of the high powered boats, there would be an increase in the theoretical maximum boat capacity.
The existing level of boating use, however, is currently below the capacity with the current pool, thus it would appear that additional boat access either through marinas or launch areas would be needed to achieve more boating activity.
Fishing activity on a larger pool is expected to decrease in several respects.
Wade fishing will decrease in the pool area that would be too deep to wade.
Boat fishing rate is currently lower on the pooled area of the river and, making the pool larger, could be expected to reduce the amount of boat fishing on the enlarged pool.
Bank fishing rate is expected to be unchanged.
Safety A dam replacement at elevation 294 feet would mitigate the structure safety issue and give the City the opportunity to mitigate the dangerous hydraulic.
The design of a new inflatable dam could incorporate the results of theoretical and physical hydraulic modeling that would reduce or eliminate any hydraulic backwash effect at normal flows.
Also, in late winter and early spring when most tragedies at the dam occur, the dam could actually be deflated.
47
Ease of Regulatory Process A Dam Safety Permit would be required from DEP and Water Quality Certification approval from the Commonwealth.
An Individual Permit would be required from the Army Corp of Engineers.
It is expected that an Environmental Impact Statement (EIS) would be required by the Army Corp.
A public hearing would be likely.
Nuisance Impacts Not evaluated Cost (See Appendix D for cost breakdown) Low sill dam Cost Infrastructure mitigation Total project cost High sill dam Cost Infrastructure mitigation Total project cost Economic Impacts Not evaluated $12,938,000 $ 6,542,000 $19,480,000 $11,293,000 $ 6,542,000 $17,835,000
IV E 2.
Replace with Inflatable Dam with elevation 296' Environmental Impacts Water quality: This alternative would be expected to result in incrementally more minor degradation from decreased dissolved oxygen, increased temperature and turbidity and minor sediment deposition than experienced with a dam at elevation 294'.
Wetlands: A total of 96.39 acres of wetlands would be impacted upriver to the point with a minimum one foot increase in water level elevation.
These impacts include: 8.93 acres forested 31.72 acres scrub-shrub 55.74 acres emergent Birds: There would be a more severe adverse impact on birds if the dam was raised to 296 ft msl.
More than one third of the wetlands in the area would be impacted which would diminish the availability of feeding areas.
Areas greatly impacted would be the shallow areas upstream of West Fairview including the lower end of Sheets Archipelago and Governor's Island.
Island shoreline lengths would decrease and reduce the areas for shore and bank birds.
Increased boat access to key shallow water bird feeding areas would increase harassment.
West Fairview boat ramp may become very active and
48
disturbance in the Sheets Island Archipelago will be more common.
Powered boats would have improved access to Pennsylvania endangered species rookeries.
Fish: The proposed operation of the inflatable dam would restore some of the dynamics of the Susquehanna River.
The ultimate effect of this dynamic in restoring the degraded substrate in the impounded area is unknown.
During the summer reproductive period for the warmwater fishes which inhabit the Susquehanna River, however, the dam would be inflated and the pool fully formed; this situation would favor fish species that prefer shallow lake conditions.
Smallmouth bass and channel catfish spawning and nursery habitat would be adversely affected.
Fish Passage: Replacing the Dock Street Dam with a 296' MSL inflatable dam that is not operated with bags down in the spring to simulate a free flowing river, will make the goal of improving migratory fish passage very difficult to achieve.
It is likely that bags would have to be down through the majority of the migratory fish passage period and more expensive innovative fish passageway designs will be needed when the bags are raised in order to improve fish passage over the existing conditions at Dock Street Dam.
Recreation Boating: At dam height of 296' amsl, the usable boating pool is expected to increase by about 700 acres.
The larger pool could be expected to favor more powerful boat such as jet skis; which, theoretically, require more surface area per boat.
Even with an estimated doubling of the high powered boats, there would be an increase in the theoretical maximum boat capacity.
The existing level of boating use, however, is below the capacity with the current pool with the dam at elevation 292' amsl; thus, it would appear that additional boat access either through marinas or launch areas would be needed to achieve more boating activity.
Fishing trips on a larger pool are expected to be no greater; but the type of fishing will change and the catch rate of bass can be expected to decrease.
Wade fishing will decrease in the pool area that is too deep to wade.
The boat fishing rate is currently lower on the pooled area of the river than the free flowing river; however, fishing boat access to the area between West Fairview boat launch and upper end of Sheets Island is poor.
Making the pool larger, could be expected to increase the number of boat fishing trips on the enlarged pool.
Bank fishing rate is expected to be unchanged.
Safety A dam replacement at elevation 296 msl would mitigate the structure safety issue and give the City the opportunity to mitigate the dangerous hydraulic.
The design of a new inflatable dam could incorporate the results of theoretical and physical hydraulic modeling that would reduce or eliminate any hydraulic backwash effect at normal flows.
Also, in late winter and early spring when most tragedies at the dam occur, the dam could actually be deflated.
Ease of Regulatory Process
49
A state Dam Safety Permit would be required from DEP and Water Quality Certification approval from the Commonwealth.
An Individual Permit would be required from the Army Corp of Engineers.
An Environmental Impact Statement (EIS) would be required by the Army Corp of Engineers.
A public hearing would be likely be held on this proposal.
Nuisance Impacts Not evaluated Cost (See Appendix D for cost breakdown) High sill dam cost Infrastructure mitigation Total project cost High sill dam Cost Infrastructure mitigation Total project cost Economic Impacts Not evaluated $15,954,000 $ 9,650,000 $25,604,000 $12,730,000 $ 9,650,000 $22,380,000
IV E 3.
Replace with Inflatable Dam at elevation 298' Environmental Impacts Water quality: This alternative would result in the greatest impact on water quality.
This elevation would result in the most temperature increase, turbidity increase, sediment deposition and dissolved oxygen decrease.
This alternative results in the greatest dissolved oxygen effects on the river from the Conodoguinet Creek nutrients.
This dam elevation might have adverse bacterial and sediment deposition consequences from the combined sewerage/stormwater overflows.
Fish: The proposed operation of the inflatable dam would restore some of the dynamics of the Susquehanna River.
The ultimate effect of this dynamic in restoring the degraded substrate in the impounded area is unknown.
During the summer reproductive period for the warmwater fishes which inhabit the Susquehanna River, however, the dam would be inflated and the pool fully formed; this situation would favor fish species favor shallow lake conditions.
Smallmouth bass and channel catfish spawning and nursery habitat would be adversely affected.
Wetlands: A total of 148.57 acres of wetlands would be impacted upriver to the point with a minimum of one foot increase in water level elevation.
These impacts include: 10.38 acres forested 53.18 acres scrub-shrub
50
85.01 acres emergent Birds: There would be a more severe adverse impact on birds from this alternative.
Two thirds of the emergent wetlands in the area would be impacted which would diminish the availability of feeding areas.
Losses would be greatest in the Sheets Archipelago and around Governor's island.
There would be direct impact on islands and shallows near the endangered species rookery on Wade Island.
Island shoreline lengths and scrub-shrub habitat especially in the island immediately upstream of Harvey Taylor Bridge would decrease and reduce the areas for shore and bank birds.
Wetlands upstream of West Fairview would be inundated during the summer boating season.
West Fairview boat ramp may become very active and disturbance in the Sheets Island Archipelago will be more common.
Increased boat access to sensitive bird feeding areas would increase harassment.
Fish Passage: Replacing Dock Street Dam with a 298' msl inflatable dam that is not operated to simulate a free flowing river during the migratory fish period, would make it difficult to improve fish passage over existing conditions.
Recreation Boating: At a dam height of 298' amsl, the usable boating pool is expected to increase by about 1450 acres.
The larger pool could be expected to favor many more powerful boats such as jet skis and inboard engines; which, theoretically, require more surface area per boat.
Even with an estimated tripling of the high powered boats over the current situation, there would still be an increase in the theoretical maximum boat capacity.
The existing level of boating use, however, is below capacity with the dam at elevation 292' amsl; thus, it would appear that additional boat access either through marinas or launch areas would be needed to achieve more boating activity.
Fishing trips on a larger pool are not expected to be increased by this alternative, but the type of fishing will change and the catch rate of bass can be expected to decrease.
Wade fishing will decrease in the pool area.
The boat fishing rate is currently lower on the pooled area of the river than the free flowing river; however, fishing boat access to the area between West Fairview boat launch and upper end of Sheets Island is poor.
Making the pool larger, could be expected to increase the number of boat fishing trips on the enlarged pool.
Bank fishing rate is expected to be unchanged.
Safety A dam replacement at elevation 298 feet would mitigate the structural safety issue and give the City the opportunity to mitigate the dangerous existing hydraulic.
The design of a new inflatable dam could incorporate the results of theoretical and physical hydraulic modeling that would reduce or eliminate any hydraulic backwash effect at normal flows.
Also, in late winter and early spring when most tragedies at the dam occur, the dam could actually be deflated.
51
Ease of Regulatory Process A state Dam Safety Permit and a 401 required from DEP.
An Individual Pe Engineers.
An Environmental Impact Corps of Engineers.
A public hearing Nuisance Impacts Not evaluated Cost (See Appendix D for cost breakdown) Dam Cost Infrastructure mitigation Total project cost Economic Impacts Not evaluated $18,272,000 $12,099,000 $30,371,000 Water Quality Certification approval would be rmit would be required from the Army Corp of Statement (EIS) would be required by the Army would likely be held for this proposal.
IV F Operational Considerations In any of the alternatives studied involving a replacement dam, the operation of the dam is an issue.
The existing Dock Street dam is a fixed crest dam, so the operation of the dam is entirely passive.
At all times, the flow of the river is passed over and through the dam, with no ability to control the upstream elevations.
In order to fulfill the purpose of the project and to address the City's goals and objectives, the flexibility of an adjustable crest dam is an advantage.
The advantages of an adjustable crest dam include: a) the ability to deflate the dam during flood or ice events potentially reducing damage to the dam itself and upstream property; b) the timing when the dam will be inflated and deflated can be controlled, allowing the operator to improve seasonal environmental conditions for fish passage, recreation, safety and water quality; c) the spillway of a replacement dam can be designed to reduce hazardous currents downstream; d) the height of the dam can be adjusted to create the desired level of water upstream to maximize recreation opportunities and protect environmental values.
Primarily for these reasons, the alternatives that included a replacement dam were assumed to be inflatable rubber dams similar to the dam at the Shikellamy State Park in Sunbury, PA.
There are an infinite number of modes of operation possible with an inflatable dam.
The examples below are some of those discussed by the group.
The selection of the mode of operation was beyond the scope of this group and more detailed studies will be necessary in the
52
future to refine the operational mode.
There is general agreement that the operation of the dam is a key factor in achieving the project purpose, and satisfying the City's goals and objectives.
Example A The dam may be operated as a seasonal structure to coincide with the recreational boating season.
This would entail inflation of the dam on or around May 15 and deflating the dam by October 15 or November 1.
Once inflated, the dam would remain fully inflated at the selected maximum crest elevation, unless the threat of flooding occurred during this period necessitating the deflation of the dam.
"Normal" variations of flow would simply pass over the inflatable sections, with a corresponding increase or decrease in the upstream elevation of the impoundment.
This mode of operation is similar to the operation of the dam at Sunbury.
The advantages of this mode of operation are: the early part of the shad migration could pass before the dam is inflated; it does not require a sophisticated control system or a great deal of attention by human operators; protection of the bags from flood or ice damage; and it maximizes benefits for recreational boating and boat fishing.
Example B As in Example A, The dam would be inflated on May 15 and deflated in the fall.
After the initial inflation, however, the dam would be controlled by a device capable of adjusting the level of inflation in the bags to maintain a precise upstream impoundment elevation, even while river flows are changing.
The potential advantages of a stable elevation in the upstream pool include; increased water level certainty and boating safety, the stable impoundment may reduce erosion, a stable pool elevation may benefit fish spawning in the impoundment, and the operators can precisely control the upstream elevation limiting the upstream distance influenced by the dam.
Such control can mitigate potential impacts to infrastructure and natural resources upstream of the dam.
Example C In combination with the operational modes described in Examples A or B, the dam could be operated to mimic existing conditions under which increases or decreases in flows produce changed conditions in water levels.
Under existing conditions, in late spring flows begin to decrease and seasonal wetland vegetation emerges.
Often, after emergence the vegetation is periodically inundated and exposed as river flows increase and decrease.
These wetlands are sometimes covered with water for extended periods, as they were during the spring and summer of 2000.
The inflatable dam could be operated so as to produce higher levels of water upstream when improved boating conditions were desired, and lowered periodically to benefit emergent type wetlands.
These fluctuations could be induced on a weekly basis, or at such frequencies as more detailed investigations would warrant.
Such a mode of operation could have the advantage of being more protective of natural resources by minimizing impacts to wetlands while maximizing available boating acreage during peak times.
As an example, it could conceptually be possible to operate a replacement dam in this fashion with a crest elevation of 294 or 296 feet and produce river environmental conditions that could support the emergent wetland acreage that currently exists at elevation 292.
53
Further investigation of how the operation of the dam could benefit fish passage in the spring and fall should also be conducted.
For example, the operation of the dam could influence the effectiveness of a fish passage facility by enhancing attraction flows.
Although the working group does not endorse or recommend any particular modes of operation at this time, there is general agreement that the flexibility of an inflatable dam offers advantages to achieving the project purpose.
Further studies are necessary to refine the operation to maximize project benefits.
If the dam is replaced, the operation of the dam should receive careful study to develop a mode of operation that best balances the benefits to recreation, environmental resources, fish passage, water quality, and dam safety.
IV G FUNDING The working group recognized that the funding of any alternative identified is critical to its implementation.
It is particularly critical in this situation, where the implementation of many of the alternatives have such a substantial cost.
The group also recognized the broader, regional nature of the project and believes that the funding should not be limited to City of Harrisburg sources.
The group believes that an existing or future regional authority or agency should assume the responsibility for development of the project.
However, the development of an actual financing plan was beyond the scope of the group.
Rather, the group developed a list of potential sources that should be explored to finance various aspects of the project, either alone or in combination.
Certain elements of the project may be eligible for funding under the various sources listed below, while other elements would not.
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
11.
12.
13.
14.
City of Harrisburg capital funds Commonwealth of Pennsylvania capital budget line item.
Commonwealth Redevelopment Assistance Capital Project funds.
US Army Corps of Engineers, Water Resource Development Act funds US Capital budget line item.
US Fish and Wildlife Service, (fish passage) PA Department of Conservation and Natural Resources- Key 93 (Park Improvements).
Growing Greener funding US EPA, Chesapeake Bay Program funds Economic Development Administration Penn Vest Sport Fish Restoration (Boat Access) User Fees Private funds
V.
FINDINGS
These findings are a compilation of observations that were reached by the group consensus over the course of the study.
They are based on the information that was made available and the deliberations that ensued from this information as well as the collective experience of the group members.
All were considered important factors in the development of recommendations.
54
1.
The City of Harrisburg's Susquehanna River Working Group provided a venue for resolution of the dispute between the Department of Environmental Protection, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and the City.
2.
Interests of the Working Group members were highly specific to their areas of responsibility, expertise and advocacy.
3.
The deliberations of representatives on the Working Group provided an opportunity for the City to become aware of, and to address the challenges and limitations of enhancing the Dock Street Dam for the purposes of the project and to achieve the City's objectives.
4.
The purposes of the Dock Street Dam have grown far beyond its original intent to disperse and diffuse municipal sewerage and now it is a major focus for development of municipal and private recreational facilities serving the Greater Harrisburg Regional Area.
5.
There has been substantial public and private investment in the amenities associated with City Island, River Front Park and the pool formed by the Dock Street Dam. 6.
Both public and private investment has developed strictly water related recreational facilities i.e. marinas, boat launches, dockage, boats, Pride of the Susquehanna, beach, beach house, esplanade and steps.
7.
Estimates of the economic value of this recreational development and its use have not been quantified but are believed to be substantial.
8.
Although repairs were made to part of the dam in 1964, the present structural condition of Dock Street Dam has not been assessed; it is old and obviously deteriorating.
The structural integrity of Dock Street Dam is a matter of regulatory concern to the DEP Division of Dam Safety.
9.
The dangerous hydraulic condition below the Dock Street Dam has a long history of being a boating safety hazard with associated loss of life that could be addressed in the design of a new dam.
10.
Power boating is a major activity on the current Dock Street Dam pool.
11.
Presently, the demand for dock space on the Dock Street Dam pool is greater than the number of spaces available; the marinas have waiting lists for dock space.
12.
The surface area for additional boating use will increase with a higher dam but the opportunities for additional marinas and access areas may be limited.
13.
Shallow water areas and submerged rocks are hazards to boats and limit potential uses.
14.
There is limited area for operation of the paddle wheel boat "Pride of the Susquehanna", especially under low river flows.
15.
Canoeing and tubing are popular activities in the flowing river reach immediately upstream of the pool created by Dock Street Dam.
55
16.
User conflicts that normally arise between power motor boats and canoeists and tubers on the pool tend to limit or inhibit its use by canoeists and tubers.
17.
Recent estimates of recreational boating use on the Susquehanna River and the Dock Street Dam pool have not been conducted.
18.
Water quality in the Susquehanna River in the area of Harrisburg is generally good.
19.
Concerns about ecological impacts of low dissolved oxygen in the Conodoguinet Creek mixing zone with the river and bacteria levels from CSO's would increase with proposed higher replacement dams.
20.
Restoration of migratory fish, especially American shad, is a major initiative on the Susquehanna River.
21.
Improving migratory fish passage will be a major factor in any plans to renovate or replace the Dock Street Dam. 22.
Improving migratory fish passage with any higher dam alternatives will require innovative fish passage facility designs that will need to be tested with physical hydraulic modeling.
23.
The robust smallmouth bass population supports very attractive fishing for smallmouth bass in the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg.
24.
Smallmouth bass reproduction and nursery area can be expected to decrease in pooled areas of dams of greater height.
25.
The assemblage of birds in the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg is unique and includes species of wading birds that are endangered in Pennsylvania.
The area is attractive to "birders" and has been identified by the PA Audubon Society as an "Important Bird Area."
26.
A systematic river island bird update monitoring study is needed to adequately define the full diversity, frequency of occurrence and abundance of birds in this area.
27.
Higher water levels that would result in losses of shallow water and wetland feeding areas as well as allowing more frequent excursions of boats to the sensitive bird nesting areas put these Pennsylvania endangered species at risk.
28.
The free flowing area of the Susquehanna River immediately upstream of the pool created by Dock Street Dam contain extensive and diverse wetlands which are critical to the maintenance of the unique assemblage of birds in the area.
29.
The Susquehanna River, and associated wetland complex present in the study area, provides many natural environmental functions and societal values considered important to the public interest.
30.
Increasing heights of the Dock Street Dam will have increasingly adverse impacts on wetlands.
56
31.
Detailed wetland elevation mapping is required to fully delineate the wetland impacts associated with increasing dam height.
32.
None of the alternatives identified are fully satisfactory to all of the interests in the Susquehanna River near Harrisburg and the Dock Street Dam pool 33.
It is likely that the Army Corps of Engineers would direct the preparation of an Environmental Impact Statement for the increased dam height alternatives.
34.
The natural resources, recreation, and economic value of the river and the project area provide benefits and enjoyment to people throughout the Lower Susquehanna Valley.
35.
The benefits and enjoyment provided by the natural resources, recreation, and economic value of the river and project area are expected to increase significantly in the future.
36.
The region wide appeal of the river's natural resources and recreational value is expected to increase in the future, while any loss to these values will have a detrimental impact to the region.
57
IV.
Recommendations The following recommendations indicate actions believed to merit further consideration.
These consensus recommendations take into account all of the varied perspectives of the group.
They are based on consideration of all of the facts and findings that were evaluated throughout the process.
A.
The Dock Street Dam should be replaced with a rubber, inflatable dam, mounted to a reinforced concrete sill constructed on the river bottom.
B. Do not consider any dams with a replacement crest elevation greater than 296 feet above mean sea level (amsl).
C. Create a cooperative entity to oversee the development, financing, construction, operation and maintenance of any development that occurs to replace the Dock Street Dam. D. Prior to selecting an alternative, a more comprehensive environmental analysis of the alternatives should be conducted.
E. Prior to selecting an alternative a comprehensive recreational management plan for the project area should be conducted.
F. Effective and efficient fish passage must be included in any alternative that is implemented.
G.
The selected alternative must avoid negative impacts to rookeries and habitat of wading birds.
Regulations should be developed that protect the rookeries from adverse disturbances.
H.
The City and any of its future partners should explore how the natural resources provided by the river could be used for primary and secondary educational purposes.
I.
An Operational Plan is needed for any proposed inflatable dam and its impoundment area.
58
APPENDICIES APPENDIX A - Stipulation This Stipulation, by and between the City of Harrisburg ("City"), the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, Department of Environmental Protection ("DEP") and the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission ("PFBC") (collectively the "Parties") is entered into as part of the Joint Application for Extension of Stay of Proceedings.
1.
On June 28, 1996, the Environmental Hearing Board ("EHB") issued its final adjudication in the matter of the City of Harrisburg v. Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, Department of Environmental Resources and Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission at EHB Docket No. 88-120-R.
2.
The EHB sustained the City's appeal of the DEP's denial of the City's application for certification under Section 401 of the Clean Water Act in connection with the proposed development of a dam and hydroelectric project on the Susquehanna River in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania.
The EHB ordered the DEP to issue the 401 certification with appropriate conditions.
3.
The DEP filed a motion for reconsideration which was denied by the EHB on December 9, 1996.
4.
On January 8, 1997, the DEP filed an appeal of the EHB's decision to the Commonwealth Court of Pennsylvania.
5.
On March 4, 1997, the City, the DEP and PFBC applied to the Commonwealth Court for a stay of the proceedings for the purpose of conducting settlement discussions.
The Court granted the stay and several extensions thereto.
6.
The Parties have met to undertake confidential settlement discussions and the Parties have agreed to a process to attempt to resolve all of their disputes relative to the City's proposal to construct and operate a 34.4MW hydroelectric project on the Susquehanna River in Harrisburg.
7.
The parties agree to the formation of an advisors' group consisting of representatives of the Parties and the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.
In addition, the Parties will invite the Pennsylvania Game Commission, the US Army Corps of Engineers, the US Fish and Wildlife Service, the Susquehanna River Basin Commission, the Boating Advisory Board and two members from the public jointly agreed upon by the Parties to join the group (collectively the "Working Group").
8.
The Parties agree that the purpose of the Working Group is to identify alternatives to the proposed hydroelectric project that can best address the City's goals and objectives.
The Parties agree that the Working Group's major goals and objectives to be discussed and considered in its deliberations shall include the following: (a) modifications to or replacement of the existing Dock Street dam; (b) environmental and safety issues relative to the affected portions of the Susquehanna River; (c) enhancements to the City's waterfront (Riverfront Park and City Island) to benefit recreation, tourism and economic development; (d) fish passage facilities to benefit migratory fish; (e) any other improvements deemed necessary by the Working Group to address environmental and recreational issues.
9.
The Working Group will meet at least monthly for a period not to exceed one (1) year to identify alternatives to the proposed hydroelectric project, identify and discuss the positive and negative aspects associated with each of the alternatives, and identify potential source of
59
10.
11.
12.
13.
14.
15.
16.
17.
18.
funding and responsibility for the development, construction and operation for each alternative selected.
The parties agree to seek jointly a continuation of the stay of the proceedings before the Court during the pendency of the Working Group process.
At the conclusion of the one year period, the Working Group shall release a report to the public ("Report") containing its recommendations and any exceptions thereto by members of the Working Group, establishing notice of a public hearing to be held within forty-five (45) days of the issuance of the Report and a public comment period (to expire 15 days after the public hearing) to receive input from the public regarding his report.
Within 90 days of the conclusion of the public hearing, the Parties shall have concluded negotiations for a final settlement agreement wherein the Parties shall agree, at a minimum, that assuming that the working group has identified one or more alternatives the Parties agree to pursue such alternative(s) in a manner to be agree upon by the Parties taking into account any comments received during the public participation process.
So long as alternatives to the proposed hydroelectric project are, in the opinion of the City, viable and in the best interest of the City, the City shall withdraw the request for the Section 401 certification and the application pending before the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission ("FERC").
So long as the City withdraws the Section 401 certification request and the FERC application, DEP and PFBC agree to withdraw their appeals of the EHB adjudication.
If a permit or approval of any kind, including a Section 401 certification is required to implement any of the elected alternatives, the Parties agree that an application for any such project shall be submitted.
DEP will impartially review any application and will use its best efforts to expedite and coordinate the review.
Nothing in DEP's participation in the Working Group process means or shall be construed to mean that the Department will approve any application which is submitted.
Any environmental data and analyses information submitted and reviewed for the proposed hydroelectric project will be considered and utilized to the greatest extent possible, taking into account any similarity of facts, conditions and issues that may exist between such alternative and the City's original proposal.
However, nothing in the Stipulation precludes the Department from requesting any additional information which it believes is necessary or required as part of the application process.
The provisions of this Stipulation may not be modified or amended except in a writing executed by the Parties hereto.
60
APPENDIX B - Harrisburg Susquehanna River Working Group Facilitators: Karen Mitchell, Personnel Director, PA Department of Environmental Protection Jennifer Handke, Training 
Director, Southcentral Regional Office, PA Department of Environmental Protection Donald Martino, Chief, Division of Dam Safety, PA Department of Environmental Protection Dennis Dickey, Division of Dam Safety, PA Department of Environmental Protection Jack Kraeuter, Bureau of Waterways Engineering, PA Department of Environmental Protection John F. Simmons, Director, Bureau of Boating 
61
Cindy Adams Dunn, Executive Director, Pennsylvania Audubon Society Steve Oliphant, citizen representative Gregory L. Sutliff, Sutliff Chevrolet Joe Sutliff, Sutliff Chevrolet David J. Morrison, Executive Director, AIA Pennsylvania Charles A. Rhodes, Jr., Ecologist, Office of Environmental Programs, Environmental Services Division, U.S. EPA-Region III, Matt Ehrhart, Chesapeake Bay Foundation Dawson E. Flinchbaugh, Keystone Aquatic Club Joseph J. Ellam, P.E., Consulting Civil Engineer Turner Odell, Chesapeake Bay Foundation
62
APPENDIX C - Maps
63
APPENDIX D - Inflatable Dam Construction Cost Estimates (dollars x 1000) Contained in this Appendix are two separate estimates.
The first summarizes the four inflatable dam alternatives with sill height at 288 feet above mean sea level and the second represents two alternatives with higher sill heights to reduce manufacture costs as described below.
Dam Crest Elevation (feet) Sill Elevation (feet) Inflatable Dam Height (feet) Demolish Existing Dam Supply Inflatable Dam 10 spans, 300' long main dam Supply Inflatable Dams for (2) Fish Passage Structures Civil Construction Subtotal Contingency 15% Total Dam Cost Infrastructure mitigation costs* Total Project Costs Manufacturing Costs There is a breakpoint in the Bridgestone manufacturing process for their inflatable dams.
Bridgestone can manufacture in one process an inflatable dam body that would create a 5.5' high dam.
In order to make a higher rubber dam body, i.e., to create a 6' or 8' high dam, an additional manufacturing process is required to splice two rubber dam bodies together.
This additional manufacturing process significantly increases the overall costs for the inflatable dams above the breakpoint height.
Based upon a review of the profile of the river bottom in the area upstream of the existing dam, it was determined that it is possible to vary the height of the concrete sill.
The cost of a structure with a variable concrete sill and a 5.5' rubber dam is lower than a structure with the concrete sill at 288' and larger rubber dam structures.
Table 1A shows the costs of construction of the dam structure with the variation in sill heights and the constant 5.5' rubber dam. $ 292.0 288.0 4.0 300 2,275 610 5,000 8,185 1,228 $ 9,413 $ 0 $ 294.0 288.0 6.0 300 3,730 1,220 6,000 11,250 1,688 $ 12,938 $ 6,542 $ 19,480 $ 296.0 288.0 8.0 300 4,973 1,600 7,000 13,873 2,081 $ 15,954 $ 9,274 $ 25,222 $ 298.0 288.0 10.0 300 6,200 2,000 10,000 18,500 2,722 $ 18,272 $12,099 $30,371
$ 9,413
* Infrastructure mitigation costs were estimated for a river flow of 50,000 cfs.
64
ESTIMATED CONSTRUCTION COSTS (dollar X 1,000) with higher sills.
Dam Crest Elevation (feet amsl) Sill Elevation (feet amsl) Inflatable Dam Height (feet) Demolish Existing Dam Supply Inflatable Dam 10 spans @ 5.5' x 300' long main dam Supply Inflatable Dams for (2) Fish Passage Structures 5.5' H x 100' L 3.5' H x 100' L 2.0' H x 100' L Civil Construction Subtotal Contingency 15% Total Dam Cost Infrastructure Mitigation Total Project Cost $ 294.0 288.5 5.5 300 $ 296.0 290.5 5.5 300
$ 2,900
$ 2,900
1,120 5,500 9,820 1,473 $ 11,293 $ 6,542 $ 17,835
1,120 6,750 11,070 1,600 $ 12,730 $ 9,274 $ 22,004
